A Very Mysterious Ice Cream
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (sporadic appearance)
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in comedic roles
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with lucha libre influences
Signature moves: Ice Cream Sandwich (simultaneous avalanche splash with partners)
Brief description: A Very Mysterious Ice Cream was an enigmatic member of Los Ice Creams, joining the team for the 2007 King of Trios tournament. This persona was portrayed by Claudio Castagnoli (later known as Cesaro), who donned the ice cream-themed mask and attire for this event. The trio participated in comedic matches, adding a unique flavor to the tournament. 
WRESTLEZONE

ACH
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card, tournament competitor
Wrestling style: High-flying and athletic
Signature moves: Midnight Star (450° splash), Dragon Fly (springboard cutter)
Brief description: ACH debuted in CHIKARA during the Young Lions Cup X tournament in 2012, showcasing his high-energy style. He advanced to the finals but was ultimately defeated by Mark Angelosetti. ACH returned later that year to challenge Angelosetti for the Young Lions Cup but was unsuccessful in capturing the title. 
WIKIPEDIA

Aaron Biggs
Time in CHIKARA: 2017 (sporadic appearance)
Position on the card: Lower card, tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Big splash, powerslam
Brief description: Aaron Biggs made a single appearance in CHIKARA at "The Lodger" event on July 8, 2017, where he teamed with Mecha Mercenary in a tag team match against Donald Kluger and Jasper Tippins. Primarily known for his work in other promotions, Biggs' CHIKARA tenure was brief. 
PROFIGHTDB.COM

Adam Chase
Time in CHIKARA: 2017 (sporadic appearance)
Position on the card: Lower card, gauntlet match participant
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Armbar variations, suplexes
Brief description: Adam Chase participated in CHIKARA's King of Trios 2017 event, competing in a tag team gauntlet match. His involvement was limited to this event, and he did not secure a prominent position within the promotion.

Aero Star
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tournament competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high-flyer.
Signature moves: Springboard dive, La Casadora into a bulldog, Imploding 450° splash.
Brief description: Aero Star participated in CHIKARA's King of Trios 2011 tournament as part of Team AAA, alongside Drago and El Generico. Their performances were a showcase of traditional lucha libre, enhancing the international flavor of the tournament.

Aeroform
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and agile tandem offense.
Signature moves: Assisted standing moonsault, double springboard dropkick, stereo suicide dives.
Brief description: The tag team of Flip Kendrick and Louis Lyndon, known as Aeroform, competed in CHIKARA sporadically, with notable appearances in the King of Trios tournaments. Their matches displayed dynamic and aerial tag team wrestling, complementing CHIKARA’s diverse roster.

Air Wolf
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flyer.
Signature moves: Tilt-a-whirl headscissors, suicide dive, spinning heel kick.
Brief description: Air Wolf competed in CHIKARA’s Tag World Grand Prix 2019, teaming with Angel Dorado as the Flip Brothers. They showcased an exciting, aerial-based style in the tournament.

Alex Reynolds
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2013 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and balanced.
Signature moves: Superkick, spinebuster, guillotine leg drop.
Brief description: Alex Reynolds appeared in several CHIKARA events, most notably as part of the tag team Reynolds Brothers alongside John Silver. Their performances were well-received, blending technical prowess with charisma.

Alex Shelley
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission specialist.
Signature moves: Shellshock, Border City Stretch, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Alex Shelley made guest appearances in CHIKARA, participating in notable matches during its formative years. His technical skill and ability to adapt to different opponents made him a standout performer during his tenure.

Alex Zayne
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tournament competitor.
Wrestling style: Innovative high-flyer.
Signature moves: Crunchwrap Supreme (450° splash), Taco Driver (modified Michinoku Driver).

Alere Little Feather
Time in CHIKARA: 2005 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Snap Suplex, Arm Drag Variations.
Brief description: Alere Little Feather competed in CHIKARA during its early years, adding diversity and representation to the promotion’s roster. Her technical abilities and unique presence made her a notable figure in intergender and singles matches.

Alex Payne
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Bridging Suplex, Running Forearm, Single-Leg Boston Crab.
Brief description: Alex Payne appeared in CHIKARA’s early 2010s roster, participating in multi-man matches. While his tenure was brief, he displayed solid technical fundamentals.

Alex Reynolds
Time in CHIKARA: 2013 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Double Knee Strike, Spinebuster, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Alex Reynolds made a few appearances in CHIKARA, typically in tag team contests. Known for his versatility, Reynolds contributed to the depth of the tag team division during his time in the promotion.

Alex Shelley
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying with striking elements.
Signature moves: Shellshock (Swinging STO), Border City Stretch (Submission), Frog Splash.
Brief description: Alex Shelley, known for his technical mastery and charisma, competed in CHIKARA during the mid-2000s. His performances in tag team and singles matches elevated the quality of the events, showcasing his immense talent.

Alex Zayne
Time in CHIKARA: 2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Crunchwrap Supreme (630 Splash), Taco Driver (Modified Driver), Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Alex Zayne brought his high-octane style to CHIKARA’s final season, wowing audiences with his unique offense and aerial prowess. His brief run made an impact due to his creativity and energy.

All Money Is Legal
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-energy and innovative tag team offense.
Signature moves: Bankroll (double team powerbomb), stacked double dropkick, stereo planchas.
Brief description: The tag team of K-Murda and K-Pusha, known as All Money Is Legal, brought a unique urban style to CHIKARA. They participated in various events and tournaments, including Tag World Grand Prix, showcasing their dynamic tandem wrestling skills.

Allison Danger
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2006 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, intergender matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Shimmering Warlock (shining wizard), Northern Lights suplex, crossface.
Brief description: Allison Danger contributed to CHIKARA during its early years, competing in intergender and multi-person matches. As a prominent figure in women's wrestling, her appearances helped elevate the visibility of female talent in the promotion.

Amasis
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2011, 2016-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division, mid-card, occasional main event.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre and comedic.
Signature moves: Twist of Funk (somersault neckbreaker), 450° splash, arm drag variations.
Brief description: As part of The Osirian Portal, Amasis became a standout in CHIKARA, known for his charismatic personality and entertaining matches. The Portal was renowned for their innovative offense and comedic hypnotism spots. Amasis also participated in King of Trios tournaments and was an integral part of CHIKARA's tag division.

Amazing Red
Time in CHIKARA: 2013 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and fast-paced.
Signature moves: Code Red (sunset flip powerbomb), InfraRed (springboard twisting moonsault), 718 (feint 619 into a dropkick).
Brief description: Amazing Red appeared during the 2013 King of Trios tournament, teaming with The Maximos as part of Team S.A.T. Their participation added an exciting, high-flying dynamic to the event, delighting fans with their innovative maneuvers.

American Balloon
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2005 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, comedic wrestler.
Wrestling style: Comedy and unorthodox antics.
Signature moves: Balloon Buster (butt splash), comedic headlocks, inflatable weapon usage.
Brief description: American Balloon was a lighthearted character who competed primarily in comedic matches. Though his in-ring tenure was brief, his antics fit CHIKARA's blend of humor and wrestling.

American Beetle
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2005 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, comedic wrestler.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Flying crossbody, rolling arm drag, dropkick.
Brief description: American Beetle, a masked character inspired by campy superhero motifs, entertained CHIKARA fans with his playful approach to matches. He participated in King of Trios and other early CHIKARA events.

Angel Ortiz
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawler with high-energy tactics.
Signature moves: Party Crasher (cannonball senton), facewash kick, fisherman suplex.
Brief description: Angel Ortiz competed in CHIKARA as part of the tag team EYFBO (later known as Proud-N-Powerful in AEW) alongside partner Mike Draztik. Their intense style made them a strong presence in the tag division, and they participated in high-profile matches, including tournaments like King of Trios.

Anthony Greene
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Showman with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: So Much Prettier (rolling cutter), split-legged moonsault, dropkick.
Brief description: Anthony Greene appeared in CHIKARA during 2019, participating in events such as the Young Lions Cup. Known for his charismatic "Retrosexual" persona, Greene's performances added flair to the mid-card matches.

Anti-Fun Police
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and comedic division.
Wrestling style: Comedy and traditional wrestling.
Signature moves: Fun's Over (double team DDT), running knee strikes, crowd control antics.
Brief description: The Anti-Fun Police, consisting of Chief Deputy Dunne and Los Federales Santos Jr., brought their unique comedic stylings to CHIKARA, opposing all forms of entertainment and fun. They competed in tag matches and added lighthearted, memorable moments to events like King of Trios.

April Hunter
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, intergender competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Fisherman buster, full nelson slam, powerbomb.
Brief description: April Hunter competed in intergender tag team matches during her brief CHIKARA stint. Her imposing strength and commanding presence set her apart, contributing to CHIKARA's diverse roster.

AR Fox
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2013 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tournament competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Lo Mein Pain (springboard Spanish Fly), Foxcatcher (450° splash), springboard cutter.
Brief description: AR Fox participated in CHIKARA’s Rey de Voladores tournament in 2012, showcasing his high-octane, aerial wrestling style. He also competed in tag team matches, delivering standout performances with his creative and dynamic offense.

Archibald Peck
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2013 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, comedic wrestler.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical and brawler elements.
Signature moves: Baton Smash, Cranial Crescendo (diving headbutt), Peck Plex (bridging suplex).
Brief description: Archibald Peck, known for his over-the-top marching band gimmick, was a comedic mainstay in CHIKARA. He was involved in several entertaining storylines, including feuds with Colt Cabana and Mixed Martial Archie (his alternate persona). Peck’s antics made him one of the most memorable comedic characters in the promotion.

Arctic Rescue Ant
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2013 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Ant Hill (double team backdrop), flying crossbody, arm drag variations.
Brief description: Arctic Rescue Ant was a member of The Colony: Xtreme Force, a villainous offshoot of CHIKARA's beloved Colony faction. His icy-themed persona and high-energy style played into his team's comedic and antagonistic antics.

Ares
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2011 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team and stable member.
Wrestling style: European technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Tiger Driver, Basel Stretch (modified STF), rolling German suplexes.
Brief description: Ares, a Swiss wrestler, was a key member of the Bruderschaft des Kreuzes (BDK), a dominant faction in CHIKARA. Alongside Claudio Castagnoli and Tursas, Ares was integral to many of the group’s storylines, including feuds with The Colony and other CHIKARA mainstays.

Argus
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, comedic wrestler.
Wrestling style: Technical with quirky offense.
Signature moves: Slippery Clutch (modified abdominal stretch), elbow strikes, headbutts.
Brief description: Argus, "The Lizardman of the CHIKARA Wrestle Factory," combined technical wrestling with a whimsical reptilian gimmick. He was a fan favorite and often participated in comedic segments and multi-person matches.

Arik Cannon
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tournament competitor.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with technical elements.
Signature moves: Glimmering Warlock (shining wizard), Total Anarchy (modified neckbreaker), brainbuster.
Brief description: Arik Cannon was a consistent presence in CHIKARA’s early years, competing in tournaments such as Tag World Grand Prix and Young Lions Cup. His rugged, no-nonsense style made him a tough opponent in the ring.

Arik Royal
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2018 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Royal Flush (spinning facebuster), big boot, lariat.
Brief description: Arik Royal made appearances in CHIKARA as part of the CWF Mid-Atlantic contingent. His powerful, high-impact style was a contrast to the more high-flying or technical wrestlers in the promotion.

Ashley Remington
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2015 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, fan-favorite.
Wrestling style: Technical and smooth.
Signature moves: Captain's Hook (crossface chickenwing), German suplex, tope suicida.
Brief description: Ashley Remington, a gentlemanly "sailing enthusiast" persona portrayed by Dalton Castle, was known for his charismatic and polite demeanor. He gained a cult following in CHIKARA with his impeccable sportsmanship and entertaining matches, often presenting fruit baskets to his defeated opponents.

Ashley Vox
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: Fast-paced and technical.
Signature moves: Reel Catch (guillotine choke), diving crossbody, fisherman's suplex.
Brief description: Ashley Vox, part of the tag team Sea Stars with her sister Delmi Exo, brought a unique nautical theme to CHIKARA. The Sea Stars competed in events such as the King of Trios tournament, showcasing their strong chemistry and athleticism.

assailANT
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2014 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Ant Hill (double team backdrop), running knee strike.
Brief description: assailANT debuted as a member of The Swarm, an antagonistic group allied with the Gekido faction. He eventually redeemed himself and became an ally of the original Colony, embracing a more heroic role in CHIKARA.

Atlantis
Time in CHIKARA: 2008, 2015 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre.
Signature moves: La Atlantida (torture rack submission), diving headbutt, plancha.
Brief description: Atlantis, a lucha libre legend from CMLL, made guest appearances in CHIKARA, including King of Trios tournaments. His participation added prestige and international appeal to the events, as he showcased his decades of experience and skill.

Baltic Siege
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2014 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios division.
Wrestling style: Team-based with power and technical elements.
Signature moves: Baltic Barrage (triple team suplex), slingshot dropkick, double team backbreaker.
Brief description: The Baltic Siege, consisting of Estonian Thunderfrog, Lithuanian Snow Troll, and Latvian Proud Oak, represented their fictional homelands in CHIKARA. Known for their humorous yet earnest approach, the Siege engaged in feuds with the BDK and other villainous factions while winning fans with their quirky antics and teamwork.

Batiri
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and mid-card competitors.
Wrestling style: Dark and chaotic with brawling and lucha elements.
Signature moves: Demon’s Toilet (double team powerbomb), enzuigiri, springboard crossbody.
Brief description: The Batiri, consisting of Obariyon, Kodama, and Kobald, were a demonic trio who wreaked havoc in CHIKARA. Managed by Delirious and later Sinn Bodhi, they participated in multiple King of Trios tournaments and engaged in feuds with The Colony, 3.0, and others, embodying a chaotic, villainous presence.

Battle Hive
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios division.
Wrestling style: Team-based with comedic and lucha elements.
Signature moves: Bee Sting (double team DDT), flying body press, dropkicks.
Brief description: Battle Hive, led by Worker Ant and featuring wrestlers like Fire Ant and Princess KimberLee, was a reimagined version of The Colony. This faction focused on lighthearted themes while continuing to showcase exceptional in-ring ability. They often faced rival factions in CHIKARA's tag and trios matches.

Beef Wellington
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2006 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy mid-card.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Exploding Whoopee Cushion (corner cannonball), Nutcracker Suite (low blow dropkick), figure-four leglock.
Brief description: Beef Wellington brought a mix of absurd humor and wrestling skill to CHIKARA, delivering memorable comedic performances in multi-man matches.

Ben Ortiz
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, powerhouse.
Wrestling style: Power-based.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, running powerslam, clothesline.
Brief description: Ben Ortiz competed in CHIKARA as part of The Force, a faction aiming to dominate the promotion. His imposing physique and strength added a physical presence to his matches, particularly in trios competition.

Bernd Föhr
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: European technical.
Signature moves: German suplex, European uppercuts, rolling armbar.
Brief description: Bernd Föhr, a Swiss wrestler, appeared in CHIKARA as part of Die Bruderschaft des Kreuzes (BDK). His technical prowess complemented the faction’s dominance during its peak, often competing in multi-man matches and adding an international flair to the roster.

Bill Carr
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Bossman Slam, chokeslam, running shoulder tackle.
Brief description: Bill Carr teamed with Dan Barry as part of Team Tremendous in CHIKARA. Known for their humorous detective gimmick and solid tag team chemistry, the duo participated in events like King of Trios, entertaining fans with their mix of comedy and athleticism.

Bird And The Bee
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Double knee strike, springboard crossbody, German suplex variations.
Brief description: The tag team of Solo Darling (the “Bee”) and Willow Nightingale (the “Bird”) competed in CHIKARA’s vibrant tag division. Their chemistry, charisma, and innovative offense made them fan favorites during their time in the promotion.

BLANK
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction leader.
Wrestling style: Eccentric with psychological elements.
Signature moves: Unframed (bridging inverted suplex), paintbrush slap, running dropkick.
Brief description: BLANK, a performance artist-inspired persona, led the Nouveau Aesthetic faction. His character was deeply theatrical, bringing a creative edge to his matches. BLANK often used mind games to unsettle opponents and was a unique personality in CHIKARA's roster.

Blaster McMassive
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and trios division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Massive Bomb (powerbomb), running lariat, fallaway slam.
Brief description: Blaster McMassive was a dominant force in CHIKARA as part of the Devastation Corporation. Alongside Max Smashmaster and Flex Rumblecrunch, they formed a powerful trio, winning the 2014 King of Trios tournament and wreaking havoc on the tag and trios divisions.

Blind Rage
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2003, 2012-2014 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team and faction member.
Wrestling style: Dark and technical.
Signature moves: Rage Driver (death valley driver), Shining Wizard, STF.
Brief description: Blind Rage was a member of The Night Shift, a dark and eerie faction in CHIKARA’s early days. He returned years later to rejoin old allies in sporadic appearances, competing in tag and multi-person matches while maintaining his sinister persona.

BLKOUT
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2009 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and faction.
Wrestling style: Brawling and high-flying.
Signature moves: Slingshot cutter, spinebuster, frog splash.
Brief description: BLKOUT, consisting of members like Sabian and Ruckus, brought their hard-hitting style to CHIKARA events. Known for their urban edge and energetic offense, they participated in various tag matches and added a unique flavor to the promotion's diverse roster.

Blue Meanie
Time in CHIKARA: 2014 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Comedy and nostalgia act.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling.
Signature moves: Meaniesault (moonsault), bionic elbow, body splash.
Brief description: The Blue Meanie, a beloved ECW and WWE alumnus, appeared in CHIKARA’s 2014 King of Trios tournament as part of the Blue World Order. Their nostalgia-fueled performances delighted long-time fans and fit well with CHIKARA’s lighthearted atmosphere.

Blue World Order (bWo)
Time in CHIKARA: 2014 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy and nostalgia act.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with some brawling.
Signature moves: Triple team splash, superkick, elbow drops.
Brief description: The bWo—comprised of Blue Meanie, Big Stevie Cool, and Hollywood Nova—brought their iconic parody of the nWo to CHIKARA during the 2014 King of Trios. Their comedic antics and memorable teamwork added a fun and nostalgic vibe to the tournament.

Bobby Dempsey
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, senton splash, spinebuster.
Brief description: Bobby Dempsey appeared in CHIKARA’s early events, often competing in tag team matches. Known for his larger build and surprising agility, Dempsey brought a mix of power and resilience to his matches.

Boomer Hatfield
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Boomerang (springboard arm drag), tilt-a-whirl headscissors, frog splash.
Brief description: The son of CHIKARA mainstay Dasher Hatfield, Boomer Hatfield followed in his father’s footsteps as a fan-favorite competitor. He participated in CHIKARA’s tag and singles divisions, displaying his lucha libre flair and charm. Boomer was part of major storylines involving his father, showcasing his growth as a performer.

Bravado Brothers
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team division.
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team with a mix of technical and power-based offense.
Signature moves: Gentleman’s Agreement (powerbomb/neckbreaker combo), superkick, lariat.
Brief description: The Bravado Brothers, Harlem and Lancelot, brought their Southern tag team style to CHIKARA, competing in events like the King of Trios. Known for their chemistry and old-school sensibilities, they were solid contributors to CHIKARA’s tag team scene during their tenure.

Brandon Thomaselli
Time in CHIKARA: 2005 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tournament competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with striking elements.
Signature moves: 450° splash, double knee drop, enzuigiri.
Brief description: Brandon Thomaselli appeared during CHIKARA’s early years, participating in events such as the Young Lions Cup. His athletic style and aerial offense made him a standout in the ring, even with limited appearances.

Brodie Lee
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2012 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with brawling.
Signature moves: Big Boot, Brodie Bomb (running sit-out powerbomb), Black Hole Slam.
Brief description: Brodie Lee, later known as Luke Harper and Mr. Brodie Lee, was a dominant force in CHIKARA. Known as "The Big Rig," he was a key member of The Flood faction and had significant feuds with CHIKARA stalwarts like Claudio Castagnoli and Eddie Kingston. His size and athleticism made him a standout competitor, and he participated in major events such as the King of Trios.

Brown Morning of Belarus
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2014 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox and comedic.
Signature moves: Belarusian Backbreaker, running shoulder tackle, double-team suplex.
Brief description: A member of the Bloc Party faction, Brown Morning of Belarus represented a parody of Cold War-era stereotypes. His comedic persona and exaggerated style fit CHIKARA’s eccentric storytelling.

Bryan Danielson
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Main event and guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission specialist.
Signature moves: Cattle Mutilation, Regalplex, Triangle Choke.
Brief description: Bryan Danielson, later known as Daniel Bryan, appeared in CHIKARA during its formative years. A technical wrestling master, Danielson elevated the in-ring quality of events, competing in high-profile matches and showcasing his unmatched skill in events like Tag World Grand Prix.

Buck Hawke
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2007 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division, mid-card.
Wrestling style: Traditional and brawling.
Signature moves: Russian leg sweep, neckbreaker, corner splash.
Brief description: Buck Hawke was a core member of The Fabulous Two, teaming with Mitch Ryder. As a brash and arrogant heel, Hawke excelled in tag team and multi-man matches, feuding with CHIKARA fan favorites and contributing to the promotion’s early success.

Bruce Maxwell
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2006 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Backbreaker, vertical suplex, spinebuster.
Brief description: Bruce Maxwell competed as part of All Money Is Legal, a tag team known for their energetic and innovative offense. His CHIKARA tenure included participation in Tag World Grand Prix and various multi-team matches.

Brute Issei
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Running powerslam, big boot, lariat.
Brief description: Brute Issei appeared in CHIKARA as a member of the Bruderschaft des Kreuzes (BDK). His imposing size and strength made him a key enforcer for the faction during its dominant run in the promotion.

Bullet Ant
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Ant Hill (double team backdrop), springboard crossbody, tilt-a-whirl arm drag.
Brief description: Bullet Ant was part of The Colony: Xtreme Force, a faction parodying the original Colony. Known for his fast-paced, lucha-inspired style, Bullet Ant transitioned into a heroic role, allying with the original Colony members.

Buxx Belmar
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2015 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawler with unorthodox tactics.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, seated senton, cannonball splash.
Brief description: Known as "The Filthiest Wrestler Alive," Buxx Belmar brought his unusual and chaotic style to CHIKARA events. His unpredictable antics and raw aggression made him a unique addition to the roster.

Cabana Man Dan
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, comedic wrestler.
Wrestling style: Traditional and comedic.
Signature moves: Flip Flop Chop (chop with a sandal), cannonball splash, leg lariat.
Brief description: Cabana Man Dan, a beach-themed competitor, appeared at CHIKARA’s 2019 King of Trios tournament. His lighthearted persona and comedic offense entertained fans and fit CHIKARA's whimsical atmosphere.

Cajun Crawdad
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawler with thematic gimmickry.
Signature moves: Crustacean Crusher (side slam), claw hold, leg drop.
Brief description: Cajun Crawdad, a crawfish-themed wrestler, was part of the Proteus Wheel faction. He often teamed with Hermit Crab, forming a quirky duo that blended brawling with thematic storytelling. Their antics and teamwork were a hallmark of CHIKARA’s creative roster.

Callux The Castigator
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction enforcer.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Chokeslam, spinning powerbomb, big boot.
Brief description: Callux was an intimidating member of The Proteus Wheel, serving as a destructive enforcer for the faction. His size and power made him a formidable competitor, particularly in multi-person matches.

Cedric Alexander
Time in CHIKARA: 2013 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tournament competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Lumbar Check (backbreaker), brainbuster, tope con hilo.
Brief description: Cedric Alexander competed in CHIKARA’s 2013 Rey de Voladores tournament, showcasing his dynamic and explosive in-ring style. Though his time in CHIKARA was brief, his performances were well-received by fans.

Cheech
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2010 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Tidal Wave (wheelbarrow senton), springboard DDT, flying crossbody.
Brief description: Cheech, alongside his partner Cloudy, formed the popular tag team Up In Smoke. They were regular participants in CHIKARA’s tag division, including the Tag World Grand Prix tournaments. Their seamless chemistry and innovative tandem offense made them standout performers.

Cheech And Cloudy
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2010 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division, tournament competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative tandem offense.
Signature moves: Partly Cloudy With a Chance of Cheech (assisted shooting star press), double-team dropkick, stereo dives.
Brief description: Up In Smoke, consisting of Cheech and Cloudy, became fan favorites in CHIKARA’s tag team scene. Their agility and synchronized moves earned them notable success and a loyal following during their tenure.

Chet Sterling
Time in CHIKARA: 2017 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Lower card.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Superkick, fisherman buster, moonsault.
Brief description: Chet Sterling made a single appearance in CHIKARA as part of a tag team match. While his time was brief, his solid technical skills made an impression in his outing.

Chris Hero
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2007, 2010-2011 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking specialist.
Signature moves: Rolling Elbow, Hangman’s Clutch (cravate hold), Hero’s Welcome (spinning cravate cutter).
Brief description: Chris Hero was a pivotal figure in CHIKARA's early years, serving as a trainer at the Wrestle Factory and a cornerstone of the promotion's roster. As part of the Kings of Wrestling with Claudio Castagnoli, he dominated the tag division, competing in tournaments like Tag World Grand Prix and feuding with top stars. Hero also played a significant role in CHIKARA's major storylines and events, becoming one of its most influential wrestlers.

Chris Sabin
Time in CHIKARA: 2005, 2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tournament competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Cradle Shock (modified piledriver), hesitation dropkick, tornado DDT.
Brief description: Chris Sabin appeared in CHIKARA’s Tag World Grand Prix tournaments, showcasing his high-octane offense and smooth technical wrestling. Competing alongside Alex Shelley as the Motor City Machine Guns in 2007, Sabin added star power and skill to CHIKARA’s tag division during his appearances.

Chris Dickinson
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles and tag competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with strong-style influences.
Signature moves: Pazuzu Bomb (cradle powerbomb), lariat, dragon screw leg whip.
Brief description: Chris Dickinson brought his intense and hard-hitting style to CHIKARA, competing in both singles and tag team matches. Known for his no-nonsense demeanor, Dickinson was a unique presence during his sporadic appearances in the promotion.

Chuck Taylor
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2014, 2016-2018 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, comedic wrestler, and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Awful Waffle (Omega Driver), Sole Food (inverted stomp facebreaker), crossbody.
Brief description: Chuck Taylor was one of CHIKARA’s most beloved comedic performers. Known as "The Kentucky Gentleman," Taylor was integral to factions like F.I.S.T. (Friends In Similar Tights) and later the Gentleman's Club. Balancing absurd humor with in-ring skill, he became a standout in major storylines and events such as King of Trios.

CIMA
Time in CHIKARA: 2011, 2015 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Meteora (diving double knees), Schwein (modified driver), Superkick.
Brief description: A top star from Dragon Gate, CIMA appeared in CHIKARA during the 2011 and 2015 King of Trios tournaments. Competing alongside other Dragon Gate wrestlers, CIMA’s presence brought international prestige and elevated the tournament’s significance.

CJ Esparza
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and fast-paced.
Signature moves: 450° splash, springboard cutter, enzuigiri.
Brief description: CJ Esparza, often teaming with Brett Gakiya as part of Zero Gravity, brought an exciting aerial style to CHIKARA. The duo competed in tag team and trios matches, thrilling fans with their synchronized high-flying offense.

Cindy Rogers
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, intergender competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: TCB (armbar variation), Northern Lights suplex, neckbreaker.
Brief description: Cindy Rogers competed in CHIKARA's early intergender matches, showcasing her technical wrestling ability. Though her time in the promotion was brief, her performances were solid contributions to CHIKARA's evolving roster.

Claudio Castagnoli
Time in CHIKARA: 2003-2011 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, tag team division.
Wrestling style: European technical and powerhouse.
Signature moves: Ricola Bomb (sit-out powerbomb), UFO (spinning airplane spin without hands), Alpamare Waterslide (scoop slam piledriver).
Brief description: Claudio Castagnoli, later known as Cesaro, was a cornerstone of CHIKARA. As a member of the Kings of Wrestling with Chris Hero, Claudio dominated the tag team division, participating in tournaments like Tag World Grand Prix and King of Trios. He also played a key role in the Bruderschaft des Kreuzes (BDK) faction, bringing a blend of athleticism, technical ability, and charisma to the promotion.

Cloudy
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2010 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Sunset flip, springboard crossbody, wheelbarrow stunner.
Brief description: Cloudy, one-half of the tag team Up In Smoke with Cheech, was a regular in CHIKARA’s tag division. Known for his agility and innovative tandem offense, Cloudy contributed to many memorable tag matches and tournaments like Tag World Grand Prix.

Colin Delaney (Colin Delaney Olsen)
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2009, 2015-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and comedic.
Signature moves: Dropkick, moonsault, running bulldog.
Brief description: Colin Delaney was an integral part of CHIKARA’s early years as one-half of The Olsen Twins with Jimmy Olsen. Known for his comedic antics and high-energy style, Colin participated in tag tournaments and various multi-person matches, returning in later years for guest appearances.

Colony
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and trios division, faction.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired with teamwork emphasis.
Signature moves: Ant Hill (double team backdrop), Suicide Dive Train, Ant-apult.
Brief description: The Colony, consisting of Fire Ant, Soldier Ant, and Worker Ant (with occasional other members), was one of CHIKARA’s most beloved factions. Their insect-themed gimmick and exceptional teamwork made them central to CHIKARA’s tag and trios divisions. They were multi-time winners of the King of Trios and involved in numerous high-profile feuds, including clashes with The BDK and The Flood.

Colony Xtreme Force
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2014 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired with comedic and villainous elements.
Signature moves: Flying Ant Drop (assisted crossbody), Ant Bomb (powerbomb variation), spinning headscissors.
Brief description: Colony Xtreme Force, a parody of the original Colony, featured characters like Arctic Rescue Ant, Missile Assault Ant, and Orbit Adventure Ant. This faction was part of CHIKARA's storytelling focused on corporate meddling, serving as comedic antagonists to the heroic Colony.

Colt Cabana
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2013 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, comedic wrestler.
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic flair.
Signature moves: Colt 45 (double underhook backbreaker), Flying Apple (corner splash), Billy Goat’s Curse (inverted Boston crab).
Brief description: Colt Cabana was a frequent guest in CHIKARA, bringing his signature comedic style to matches and segments. He participated in high-profile events such as King of Trios and was involved in entertaining feuds with characters like Archibald Peck.

combatANT
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2014 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Brawling and power-based.
Signature moves: Ant Hill (team-assisted backdrop), lariat, gutwrench suplex.
Brief description: combatANT was a member of The Swarm, an antagonistic group within the Gekido faction. Known for his aggressive and rebellious demeanor, combatANT often clashed with members of The Colony and participated in factional storylines.

CP Munk
Time in CHIKARA: 2005 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Parody/comedic.
Signature moves: Acorn Buster (spinning facebuster), "Tree Hug" bear hug, comedic stomps.
Brief description: CP Munk was a satirical character parodying CM Punk, complete with a chipmunk costume. His over-the-top antics and absurd persona made him a memorable part of CHIKARA’s early years.

Cornelius Crummels
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2018 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Traditional with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Gentleman’s Clutch (bridging pin), double team suplex, eye pokes.
Brief description: Cornelius Crummels, along with Sonny Defarge, formed an old-timey heel tag team. Their comedic approach and classic villainous tactics made them a popular act in CHIKARA’s tag division, often competing against heroic teams like The Colony.

CPA
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy mid-card.
Wrestling style: Gimmick-based, technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Tax Cutter (Ace Crusher), abdominal stretch, roll-up pins.
Brief description: CPA, portraying a tax accountant gimmick, was a comedic addition to CHIKARA’s roster. His character and in-ring style fit well within the promotion’s whimsical storytelling framework.

Da Soul Touchaz
Time in CHIKARA: 2008-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and trios division.
Wrestling style: High-energy with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Chicago Skyline (springboard cutter), triple team dropkick, stereo planchas.
Brief description: Da Soul Touchaz, consisting of Marshe Rockett, Acid Jaz, and Willie Richardson, with manager C. Red, brought their Chicago-based flavor and charisma to CHIKARA. They participated in King of Trios tournaments, entertaining fans with their dynamic teamwork and charm.

Daizee Haze
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2011 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, intergender competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Heart Punch, Daizee Cutter (springboard cutter), Mind Trip (snapmare driver).
Brief description: A key figure in CHIKARA’s intergender matches, Daizee Haze was a highly skilled and charismatic competitor. She often teamed with or competed against CHIKARA regulars and contributed to the promotion’s unique approach to gender-inclusive wrestling.

Crossbones
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction enforcer.
Wrestling style: Brawler with power-based offense.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, running lariat, big boot.
Brief description: Crossbones, a member of the sinister Order of the Neo-Solar Temple faction, served as a loyal enforcer. His menacing presence added muscle to the group, and he was often involved in feuds against CHIKARA’s heroic factions.

Crown And Court
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction.
Wrestling style: Technical and teamwork-oriented.
Signature moves: Triple team suplex, chain wrestling sequences, synchronized dives.
Brief description: Crown and Court, led by Princess KimberLee and featuring Jervis Cottonbelly, Los Ice Creams, and others, embodied the whimsical spirit of CHIKARA. Their combination of comedic charm and skilled wrestling made them fan favorites, often involved in trios matches and comedic rivalries.

Dan Champion
Time in CHIKARA: 2019-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Champion Bomb (sit-out powerbomb), running shoulder tackle, bear hug.
Brief description: Dan Champion brought a blend of power and humor to CHIKARA, often performing in tag team or multi-man matches. His exaggerated persona and imposing frame made him a unique character on the roster.

Danjerhawk
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2019 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Flight of the Hawk (springboard cutter), tornado DDT, diving splash.
Brief description: Danjerhawk, a member of the Xyberhawx 2000 faction, represented the group's high-energy, futuristic vibe. Known for his agility and innovative offense, he competed in singles matches and multi-person events, showcasing his dynamic skill set.

Danny Havoc
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, dragon suplex, moonsault.
Brief description: Danny Havoc, better known for his deathmatch wrestling elsewhere, brought his hardcore style to CHIKARA in select appearances. Competing in tournaments and multi-man matches, he added an edge of unpredictability to the roster during his brief tenure.

Darin Corbin
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy with striking elements.
Signature moves: Ginger Snap (Ace Crusher), spinning backfist, superkick.
Brief description: Darin Corbin, often teaming with Ryan Cruz as part of The North Star Express, brought a mix of comedy and solid wrestling to CHIKARA. Their lighthearted antics and smooth teamwork made them entertaining additions to the tag team division.

Darkness Crabtree
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2004 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, comedic wrestler.
Wrestling style: Comedy with basic technical moves.
Signature moves: Old School (arm wrench rope walk), walking cane attack, sleeper hold.
Brief description: Darkness Crabtree, a parody of an aging wrestler, was a CHIKARA original. His exaggerated movements and humorous selling made him a cult favorite, often competing in comedic matches or as a manager-like figure.

Dasher Hatfield
Time in CHIKARA: 2008-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional technical with comedic and heroic elements.
Signature moves: Grand Slam (swinging neckbreaker), Seventh Inning Stretch (abdominal stretch), suicide dive.
Brief description: Dasher Hatfield, "The Old-Timey King of Swing," was a beloved figure in CHIKARA. Starting as a baseball-themed comedic character, Dasher evolved into a serious competitor and eventual Grand Champion of CHIKARA. His blend of charisma, technical skill, and storytelling made him a central figure in many major storylines.

Dasher's Dugout
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2019 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction.
Wrestling style: Team-based technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Group-assisted slams, synchronized tag team maneuvers, crowd interaction tactics.
Brief description: Dasher's Dugout, led by Dasher Hatfield, featured wrestlers like Boomer Hatfield and others. The faction represented sportsmanship and teamwork, frequently competing in trios matches and embodying the spirit of camaraderie in CHIKARA.

Delirious
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2015 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, faction leader.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox and technical.
Signature moves: Chemical Imbalance II (swinging inverted DDT), Shadows Over Hell (top rope splash), Panic Attack (running knee).
Brief description: Delirious was a standout performer in CHIKARA, known for his unpredictable antics and wild charisma. He was a key member of The Order of the Neo-Solar Temple and played a significant role in CHIKARA’s faction warfare, engaging in feuds with major teams like The Colony.

Delmi Exo
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Bridging suplex, dropkick, fisherman's suplex.
Brief description: Delmi Exo, teaming with her sister Ashley Vox as The Sea Stars, brought a nautical-themed, dynamic energy to CHIKARA. The duo competed in tag tournaments and showcased strong chemistry, earning them a loyal following.

Deucalion
Time in CHIKARA: 2014 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, faction enforcer.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Choke Breaker (chokeslam into a backbreaker), powerbomb, lariat.
Brief description: Deucalion was the monstrous leader of The Flood faction, serving as a primary antagonist in CHIKARA's darkest storylines. His size and dominance made him a terrifying figure, and he was responsible for several storyline "deaths" of wrestlers, adding to the mythos of CHIKARA’s lore.

Devastation Corporation
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and trios division, faction.
Wrestling style: Power-based and traditional heavyweight wrestling.
Signature moves: Death Blow (assisted powerbomb), tandem shoulder tackles, triple team slams.
Brief description: The Devastation Corporation, consisting of Max Smashmaster, Blaster McMassive, and Flex Rumblecrunch, dominated CHIKARA’s tag and trios divisions. The trio won the 2014 King of Trios tournament and was a consistent force in the promotion, known for their brute strength and destruction.

deviANT
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2014 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired with aggression.
Signature moves: Ant Hill (team-assisted backdrop), dropkick variations, armdrag takedowns.
Brief description: deviANT was part of The Swarm, an offshoot of the Gekido faction. Initially an antagonist to The Colony, deviANT participated in faction rivalries and trios tournaments, adding tension and drama to the division.

Dez Peloton
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2018 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Team-based technical and comedic wrestling.
Signature moves: Tandem Bicycle Kick, Spinning Tandem Suplex, synchronized elbow drops.
Brief description: Dez Peloton, a cycling-themed tag team featuring Jasper Tippins and Donald Kluger, brought a unique and comedic approach to CHIKARA. They participated in tag tournaments and multi-team matches, with their teamwork and themed antics endearing them to fans.

Dick Justice
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, comedic wrestler.
Wrestling style: Comedy with traditional brawling.
Signature moves: Justice Slam (powerslam), comedic arm drag, lariat.
Brief description: Dick Justice, playing a parody of an over-the-top lawman, entertained CHIKARA audiences with his humorous and self-aware persona. He competed in comedic matches and segments, contributing to the promotion's lighthearted atmosphere.

Dick Togo
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Japanese technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Pedigree, Senton Bomb, crossface.
Brief description: Dick Togo, a legendary Japanese wrestler, participated in the 2010 King of Trios tournament, teaming with Jinsei Shinzaki and The Great Sasuke as Team Michinoku Pro. His contributions elevated the prestige of the event, showcasing his skill and legendary status.

Die Bruderschaft des Kreuzes (BDK)
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2011 (dominant faction).
Position on the card: Main event, faction.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based team wrestling.
Signature moves: Tandem suplexes, coordinated attacks, interference tactics.
Brief description: Die Bruderschaft des Kreuzes (BDK), led by Ares and Claudio Castagnoli, was one of CHIKARA’s most dominant and infamous factions. The group included notable members such as Tursas, Pinkie Sanchez, and Sara Del Rey. BDK’s reign of terror included factional feuds, tournament victories, and a storyline takeover of CHIKARA, making them central to the promotion's history.

Devon Moore
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and hardcore.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, moonsault, springboard DDT.
Brief description: Devon Moore made limited appearances in CHIKARA, showcasing his blend of aerial and hardcore wrestling. Though his CHIKARA tenure was brief, his style provided variety to the events he participated in.

Don Montoya
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2004 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with traditional technical elements.
Signature moves: Montoya Bomb (sit-out powerbomb), big splash, running lariat.
Brief description: Don Montoya was a key figure during CHIKARA’s early years, often teaming with Mike Quackenbush as part of the promotion’s foundational roster. His hard-hitting style and veteran presence made him a staple in early tag matches and multi-man events.

Donald Kluger
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2018 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy-based with technical and team-oriented elements.
Signature moves: Tandem Bicycle Kick, synchronized back suplex, comedic roll-ups.
Brief description: Donald Kluger, one-half of Dez Peloton alongside Jasper Tippins, embraced a cycling-themed gimmick. Their comedic teamwork and innovative offense were highlights of CHIKARA’s tag division, often delighting audiences with their unique antics.

Dr. Cheung
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2004 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, comedic wrestler.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox comedy wrestling.
Signature moves: Doctor Bomb (powerbomb variation), exaggerated strikes, comedic distractions.
Brief description: Dr. Cheung was a lighthearted character in CHIKARA’s early years, known for his humorous persona and quirky in-ring antics. Though not a major competitor, his appearances added variety and fun to early CHIKARA events.

Dr. Cube
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Comedic guest villain.
Wrestling style: Character-driven with comedic and villainous antics.
Signature moves: Cube Smash (striking move), villainous interference tactics.
Brief description: Dr. Cube, a character from Kaiju Big Battel, made a memorable guest appearance in CHIKARA as part of the King of Trios 2007 tournament. Known for his over-the-top evil scientist gimmick and comical villainy, Dr. Cube added a surreal and entertaining element to the event.

Dr. Cube's Posse
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Comedic faction.
Wrestling style: Villainous comedic team-based wrestling.
Signature moves: Double team strikes, chaotic interference, group distractions.
Brief description: Dr. Cube’s Posse, a faction from Kaiju Big Battel, accompanied Dr. Cube during their guest appearance in the 2007 King of Trios. The Posse, consisting of monstrous and bizarre characters, enhanced the comedic and absurd nature of their storyline in CHIKARA.

Drago
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2015 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high-flyer.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Dragon Twist (corkscrew plancha), Rolling Guillotine.
Brief description: Drago, a standout from AAA and Lucha Underground, participated in CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments. His acrobatic style and striking character design captivated fans and solidified his status as a standout international guest.

Dragon Dragon
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2005 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Parody/comedy wrestling.
Signature moves: Dragon Splash (top rope splash), comedic tail whip, exaggerated grapples.
Brief description: Dragon Dragon, a literal dragon costume brought to life, was a comedic highlight of CHIKARA’s early years. His absurdly over-the-top matches and playful interactions with other wrestlers were emblematic of the promotion’s whimsical style.

Dragonfly
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2004 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Dragonrana, spinning headscissors, springboard crossbody.
Brief description: Dragonfly was part of CHIKARA’s original roster, showcasing his lucha libre-inspired skills in early singles and tag matches. His agile offense and colorful persona were integral to CHIKARA’s foundation during its formative years.

Drake Younger
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Hardcore with technical elements.
Signature moves: Drake’s Landing (Death Valley Driver), Tiger Driver, tope suicida.
Brief description: Drake Younger brought his intense and hardcore wrestling style to CHIKARA in select appearances. Though better known for his work in deathmatch promotions, Younger adapted well to CHIKARA’s dynamic roster, competing in multi-man matches and tournaments.

Drew Blood
Time in CHIKARA: 2003-2010 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Blood Drop (modified neckbreaker), enzuigiri, leg lariat.
Brief description: Drew Blood was a versatile competitor in CHIKARA's early years, often teaming with Rorschach and other Wrestle Factory alumni. His performances were marked by a blend of technical wrestling and high-energy strikes.

Drew Gulak
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2014 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission specialist.
Signature moves: Gulak Attack (spinning sit-out powerbomb), Gu-Lock (dragon sleeper), body scissors.
Brief description: Drew Gulak brought his no-nonsense technical style to CHIKARA, competing in singles and tag team bouts. His work with the Submission Squad and his involvement in the Wrestling Is promotions showcased his grappling expertise and dedication to storytelling in the ring.

DUSTIN (formerly Chuck Taylor)
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2018 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic and striking elements.
Signature moves: Awful Waffle (Omega Driver), Sole Food (inverted stomp facebreaker), brainbuster.
Brief description: After dropping his Chuck Taylor moniker, DUSTIN transitioned into a more aggressive and serious persona in CHIKARA. Despite his character shift, he maintained his blend of in-ring skill and subtle humor, competing in key matches and tournaments.

Dusto Bunny
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy mid-card.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical elements.
Signature moves: Dust Cloud (spinning elbow), hopping dropkick, humorous roll-ups.
Brief description: Dusto Bunny, a whimsical, rabbit-themed wrestler, fit perfectly into CHIKARA’s comedic ecosystem. His matches often involved lighthearted antics and playful interactions with fans and opponents alike.

DW Cycloptopuss III
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Comedy and spectacle.
Wrestling style: Parody/comedic.
Signature moves: Tentacle Smash (clothesline), comical grapples, distractions.
Brief description: DW Cycloptopuss III was a creation from Kaiju Big Battel that made an appearance in CHIKARA during the 2007 King of Trios tournament. The character’s bizarre and humorous antics added a layer of absurd fun to the event.

Eddie Kingston
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2013 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawler with strong-style influences.
Signature moves: Backfist to the Future (spinning backfist), Sliding D (sliding lariat), Saito Suplex.
Brief description: Eddie Kingston was one of CHIKARA’s most iconic wrestlers. Known as "The Last of a Dying Breed," Kingston’s gritty demeanor and emotional storytelling captivated fans. He became the first-ever CHIKARA Grand Champion in 2011 and had memorable feuds with Claudio Castagnoli, Jigsaw, and other top stars.

Egotistico Fantastico
Time in CHIKARA: 2003-2005 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre.
Signature moves: Asai Moonsault, springboard hurricanrana, tilt-a-whirl backbreaker.
Brief description: Egotistico Fantastico was a masked high-flyer who showcased a dynamic, lucha-inspired style in CHIKARA’s early years. Known for his flashy offense and vibrant personality, he was a regular competitor in singles and multi-man matches.

El Generico
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Brainbustaaah!!! (top rope brainbuster), Helluva Kick (running corner boot), Blue Thunder Bomb.
Brief description: El Generico, later known as Sami Zayn, was a standout international guest in CHIKARA. His energetic style and charismatic presence made him a fan favorite. Generico competed in high-profile matches, including King of Trios tournaments, representing lucha libre’s global appeal.

El Hijo del Ice Cream
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy tag team division.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with lucha libre elements.
Signature moves: Ice Cream Sandwich (assisted avalanche splash), cone-based distractions, spinning armdrag.
Brief description: A member of Los Ice Creams, El Hijo del Ice Cream brought comedic antics and lucha-style offense to CHIKARA’s tag division. Their humor-driven matches and antics made them a consistent source of entertainment for fans.

El Pantera
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor, tournament participant.
Wrestling style: Traditional lucha libre.
Signature moves: Moonsault, hurricanrana, armdrag variations.
Brief description: El Pantera, a veteran luchador, participated in the 2008 King of Trios tournament as part of Team Mexico, alongside Incognito and Lince Dorado. His experience and smooth lucha style added an authentic flavor to CHIKARA’s international tournament.

Emil Sitoci
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Dutch Death Drop (springboard reverse DDT), German suplex, springboard crossbody.
Brief description: Emil Sitoci, a Dutch wrestler, made several appearances in CHIKARA during its formative years. Known for his blend of technical prowess and agility, he competed in singles and multi-man matches, leaving a solid impression on fans.

Equinox
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2009 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, springboard DDT, armbar.
Brief description: Equinox was a masked competitor who embodied the lucha libre style that CHIKARA often showcased. He was involved in key storylines and tournaments, including the Young Lions Cup, where his character arc played a significant role.

Eric Corvis
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawler with technical elements.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, lariat, spinebuster.
Brief description: Eric Corvis competed in CHIKARA during its mid-era, often in tag team or trios matches. His gritty, hard-hitting style made him a solid competitor, though his tenure was relatively brief.

EYFBO
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and trios division.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting with aerial elements.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper (assisted flipping DDT), tandem superkick, double team powerbomb.
Brief description: EYFBO, later known as Proud-N-Powerful (Santana and Ortiz), made a mark in CHIKARA’s tag division with their blend of power and agility. They participated in multi-team matches and trios tournaments, leaving an impression with their intense style and charisma.

Fire Ant
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, tag team and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with technical elements.
Signature moves: Beach Break (cradle slam), Antapult (slingshot splash), diving crossbody.
Brief description: Fire Ant, a core member of The Colony, was a fan-favorite for his relentless energy and high-flying offense. He was integral to many of CHIKARA’s storylines and events, including multiple King of Trios victories. Fire Ant’s consistency and dynamic wrestling made him a standout performer.

Estonian ThunderFrog
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2014, 2016-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Frog Splash, Thunder Hammer Smash, powerbomb.
Brief description: Estonian ThunderFrog, a member of the Baltic Siege, combined his humorous gimmick with impressive strength and agility. His oversized hammer and over-the-top persona made him a memorable part of CHIKARA’s roster.

Fabulous Two
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2007 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Traditional and comedic heel tactics.
Signature moves: Double suplex, Russian leg sweep, cheap shots.
Brief description: The Fabulous Two, consisting of Mitch Ryder and Buck Hawke, were a heel tag team known for their arrogant and old-school approach. They often feuded with CHIKARA’s heroic teams, adding depth and humor to the tag team division.

Fenix
Time in CHIKARA: 2015 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high-flyer.
Signature moves: Black Fire Driver (fireman’s carry driver), Spanish Fly, dive variations.
Brief description: Fenix, one of lucha libre’s brightest stars, participated in the 2015 King of Trios tournament. Teaming with Drago and Aerostar, Fenix brought high-flying excellence and international prestige to the event, thrilling fans with his acrobatics.

F.I.S.T. (Friends in Similar Tights)
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with teamwork emphasis.
Signature moves: Doomsday Device (clothesline from shoulders), tandem superkicks, spinebuster variations.
Brief description: F.I.S.T., originally consisting of Icarus, Gran Akuma, and later adding Chuck Taylor, Johnny Gargano, and others, was one of CHIKARA’s most dominant factions. Known for their villainous tactics and in-ring chemistry, F.I.S.T. was a cornerstone of the tag and trios divisions, winning multiple tournaments and championships.

Flex Rumblecrunch
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and trios division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Death Blow (assisted powerbomb), running shoulder tackle, delayed vertical suplex.
Brief description: Flex Rumblecrunch was a key member of the Devastation Corporation, known for their destructive dominance in CHIKARA. Alongside Blaster McMassive and Max Smashmaster, he won the 2014 King of Trios tournament, cementing their status as one of CHIKARA’s most formidable teams.

Flip Kendrick
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Shooting Star DDT, springboard corkscrew moonsault, tilt-a-whirl headscissors.
Brief description: Flip Kendrick, often teaming with Louis Lyndon as Aeroform, brought a breathtaking aerial style to CHIKARA. The team participated in tournaments like King of Trios, wowing fans with their acrobatic maneuvers and seamless teamwork.

The Flood
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2015 (faction storyline).
Position on the card: Main event faction.
Wrestling style: Power-based and faction warfare.
Signature moves: Group ambush attacks, powerbomb variations, coordinated interference.
Brief description: The Flood was a faction formed to destroy CHIKARA, led by Deucalion and consisting of members from other villainous factions like The Wrecking Crew and The BDK. Their storyline was central to CHIKARA’s revival after its 2013 hiatus, with major feuds against CHIKARA’s heroes, including The Colony and Dasher’s Dugout.

Francis Kipland Stevens
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Parody and lighthearted technical.
Signature moves: Schoolboy roll-up, drop toe-hold, playful grapples.
Brief description: Francis Kipland Stevens was a whimsical character in CHIKARA’s early years. Known for his exaggerated antics and comedic approach, he participated in multi-person matches and segments that highlighted CHIKARA’s playful side.

Frantik
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Brawler with chaotic elements.
Signature moves: Frantik DDT (spiking DDT), running forearm smash, lariat.
Brief description: Frantik was a member of the Proteus Wheel, a faction created by Professor Nicodemus to bring chaos to CHIKARA. Known for his wild and unhinged style, Frantik was a menacing presence in tag team and trios matches.

Frightmare
Time in CHIKARA: 2008-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying with a dark, chaotic edge.
Signature moves: Kneecolepsy (diving double knee drop), flipping DDT, suicide dive.
Brief description: Frightmare was a key member of The Spectral Envoy, alongside Hallowicked and UltraMantis Black. His acrobatic style and creepy persona made him a fan favorite and a standout in CHIKARA’s trios and singles divisions. Frightmare participated in many King of Trios tournaments and was central to major storylines involving The Flood and the Eye of Tyr.

Freddie Mercurio
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Bohemian Rhapsody (tilt-a-whirl DDT), diving crossbody, kip-up superkick.
Brief description: Freddie Mercurio, a flamboyant and quirky competitor, brought his British humor and lucha-inspired moves to CHIKARA. His brief appearances included comedic matches that showcased his charisma and in-ring creativity.

Furies
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Faction, mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with teamwork emphasis.
Signature moves: Coordinated attacks, submission holds, trios slams.
Brief description: The Furies were a heroic faction created to stand against the villainous Proteus Wheel and other threats. Led by Icarus and featuring various CHIKARA stalwarts, the Furies represented justice and unity, often taking center stage in major factional storylines.

Future Is Now
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to faction-level prominence.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, teamwork-focused.
Signature moves: Tandem dives, quick transitions, innovative double-team maneuvers.
Brief description: The Future Is Now was a faction comprising young, energetic wrestlers, including characters like Razerhawk and Thief Ant. They represented the next generation of CHIKARA talent, often feuding with more experienced or villainous factions and competing in trios matches.

Gavin Loudspeaker
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2013 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Ring announcer and occasional competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy with light technical elements.
Signature moves: Loudsplash (top rope splash), microphone-assisted distractions.
Brief description: Gavin Loudspeaker, CHIKARA’s charismatic ring announcer, was a beloved personality who occasionally stepped into the ring for comedic matches. His musical performances and enthusiastic persona added to the vibrant energy of CHIKARA events.

Gary Jay
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles and tag competitor.
Wrestling style: Striker with technical elements.
Signature moves: Lariat, superkick, running knee strike.
Brief description: Gary Jay brought his hard-hitting, no-nonsense style to CHIKARA in sporadic appearances, often competing in multi-man matches and tag team contests. Though his tenure was brief, his intense performances left an impression.

Gavin Quinn
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Suplex variations, dropkick, headlock takedowns.
Brief description: Gavin Quinn made a limited appearance in CHIKARA, showcasing his fundamental technical wrestling ability in a few undercard matches. His run in the promotion was brief but solid.

GEKIDO
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2014 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Faction, mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Aggressive, brawling with some technical elements.
Signature moves: Group ambushes, powerbombs, and faction-based interference.
Brief description: GEKIDO was a villainous faction of doppelgangers that mimicked The Colony and other CHIKARA favorites, including combatANT, deviANT, and 17. Their storyline revolved around chaos and destruction, feuding heavily with The Colony and other heroic teams. They played a key role in CHIKARA's faction wars.

Gentleman’s Club
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, comedic faction.
Wrestling style: Comedy and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Group suplexes, comedy distractions, exaggerated selling.
Brief description: The Gentleman’s Club, led by Chuck Taylor and featuring members like Orange Cassidy, Drew Gulak, and Swamp Monster, brought a mix of technical wrestling and absurd humor to CHIKARA. They were fan favorites, with their lighthearted antics providing a comedic counterpoint to the promotion’s serious rivalries.

Gran Akuma
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2010, 2012-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, faction member.
Wrestling style: Striker and technical wrestler.
Signature moves: Yoshi Tonic (sunset flip powerbomb), Falcon Arrow, top rope hurricanrana.
Brief description: Gran Akuma was an original member of F.I.S.T. and a key figure in CHIKARA’s early years. Known for his striking and high-flying abilities, Akuma was part of major storylines, including King of Trios tournaments and feuds with The Colony. He eventually left F.I.S.T. and became a solo competitor, continuing to impress with his hard-hitting style.

Glacier
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Striker with martial arts influence.
Signature moves: Cryonic Kick (superkick), spinning backfist, armbar.
Brief description: Glacier, a WCW veteran with a martial arts-themed gimmick, appeared in CHIKARA during the 2016 King of Trios tournament. Teaming with other nostalgic stars, Glacier added a touch of 90s wrestling charm to the event, blending humor with his iconic moves.

Grado
Time in CHIKARA: 2015 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Comedy mid-card.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with fundamental techniques.
Signature moves: Wee Boot (running boot), bionic elbow, roll-up.
Brief description: Grado, a Scottish wrestling star known for his hilarious antics, competed in CHIKARA during the 2015 King of Trios tournament. His charisma and comedic timing endeared him to fans, leaving a memorable impression during his limited appearances.

Great Sasuke
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Thunder Fire Powerbomb, Senton Atomico, rolling cross armbreaker.
Brief description: The legendary Japanese wrestler Great Sasuke appeared in the 2010 King of Trios tournament as part of Team Michinoku Pro with Dick Togo and Jinsei Shinzaki. His experience and innovative moves added prestige to the tournament and thrilled fans.

Green Ant
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2015 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Cloverleaf, Ant Hill (team-assisted backdrop), springboard crossbody.
Brief description: Green Ant, a member of The Colony, represented resilience and adaptability. Known for his technical skill and teamwork, he participated in major CHIKARA events, including King of Trios. Green Ant also played a key role in feuds with GEKIDO and other villainous factions.

Gregory Iron
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2015 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and resilient.
Signature moves: Handicapped Parking (Codebreaker), crossface, dropkick.
Brief description: Gregory Iron, known as "The Handicapped Hero," competed in CHIKARA despite living with cerebral palsy. His story of overcoming adversity inspired fans. He often teamed with wrestlers like Colt Cabana and was part of memorable tag team matches and storylines.

Grizzly Redwood
Time in CHIKARA: 2008-2011 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team, and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Axehandle Smash, Tilt-a-Whirl Headscissors, crossbody.
Brief description: Grizzly Redwood, "The Littlest Lumberjack," brought a blend of humor and scrappiness to CHIKARA. Known for his oversized personality despite his small stature, he competed in tag teams and singles matches, often underdogging his way to victory.

Hailey Hatred
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Lariat, spinning backfist.
Brief description: Hailey Hatred, a powerful and skilled competitor, made a few impactful appearances in CHIKARA. Known for her strength and toughness, she faced off against male and female competitors, leaving an impression as a fierce and determined wrestler.

Hallowicked
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, tag team, and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with dark character elements.
Signature moves: Graveyard Smash (Fisherman Driver), Yakuza Kick, Swanton Bomb.
Brief description: Hallowicked, a CHIKARA original, was one of the most enduring and beloved wrestlers in the promotion’s history. As a member of The Dark Order and later The Spectral Envoy, he played a pivotal role in CHIKARA’s biggest storylines, including King of Trios victories and his run as Grand Champion. His eerie charisma and in-ring versatility made him a standout performer.

Harlem Bravado
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional with technical elements.
Signature moves: Gentleman’s Agreement (Powerbomb/Neckbreaker combo), suplex variations, lariat.
Brief description: Harlem Bravado, one-half of the Bravado Brothers with Lancelot Bravado, brought their Southern style and sibling chemistry to CHIKARA. They participated in King of Trios tournaments and added a solid, traditional tag team dynamic to the promotion.

Heart Throbs (Antonio Thomas & Romeo Roselli)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy mid-card, tag team.
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team wrestling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Double team flapjack, suplex variations, corner splashes.
Brief description: The Heart Throbs, former WWE stars, appeared in CHIKARA as a comedic and flamboyant tag team. They participated in Tag World Grand Prix tournaments, showcasing their entertaining personalities and cohesive teamwork.

Heartbreak Express (Phil Davis & Sean Davis)
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team.
Wrestling style: Traditional and brawling.
Signature moves: Double team DDT, corner clotheslines, tandem leg drops.
Brief description: The Heartbreak Express appeared in CHIKARA’s tag team division, bringing their over-the-top antics and Southern wrestling style. Their charismatic and brash personas made them memorable contributors to the promotion’s events.

Hatfields And McCoy (Dasher Hatfield & Mark Angelosetti)
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2015 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team with technical and power elements.
Signature moves: Assisted suplex, double team crossbody, spinebuster.
Brief description: Dasher Hatfield and Mark Angelosetti, despite a complicated on-screen relationship, formed a successful tag team. Known for their contrasting styles—Dasher’s technical expertise and Mark’s brute strength—they were a unique and engaging pairing in CHIKARA’s tag division.

Heidi Lovelace
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Heidi-Can-Rana (hurricanrana), diving senton, superkick.
Brief description: Heidi Lovelace, later known as Ruby Soho, was a beloved competitor in CHIKARA, known for her fierce strikes and underdog spirit. She participated in intergender matches and trios tournaments, often showcasing her resilience and skill against larger opponents.

Helios
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2010 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: 630° Senton, Sky High (springboard splash), arm drag variations.
Brief description: Helios, a masked high-flyer, was a fan favorite in CHIKARA. Known for his breathtaking aerial maneuvers, he was a member of The Future Is Now faction and participated in King of Trios tournaments. His agility and creativity made him a standout performer.

Hermit Crab
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical elements.
Signature moves: Crabwalk Splash, Claw Slam, Boston Crab.
Brief description: Hermit Crab, a member of the aquatic-themed duo with Cajun Crawdad, brought a unique and comedic style to CHIKARA. Their matches often combined humor with solid wrestling, and they participated in tag team events and trios matches.

Hieracon
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: Corkscrew Plancha, Diving Moonsault, Dragonrana.
Brief description: Hieracon was a masked member of The Osirian Portal, teaming with Amasis and Ophidian. His lucha-inspired style and synchronized teamwork with his faction made him a vital part of CHIKARA's tag and trios divisions during his tenure.

Hollywood Nova
Time in CHIKARA: 2014 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Comedy mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Parody-based, comedic wrestling.
Signature moves: Nova Drop (running leg drop), double axe handle, team-assisted moves.
Brief description: Hollywood Nova, a member of the Blue World Order (bWo), participated in the 2014 King of Trios tournament. His nostalgic gimmick and humorous antics added a playful element to the event, delighting longtime fans of his ECW work.

Hydra
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2008 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical elements.
Signature moves: Hydralock (sleeper hold), splash, comedic headlock.
Brief description: Hydra, a comedic wrestler with a mythical sea monster gimmick, was a member of The Order of the Neo-Solar Temple. Known for his humorous antics and exaggerated persona, he was a frequent participant in tag and multi-person matches.

Hype Rockwell
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2019 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Slam Dunk (spinning sit-out powerbomb), corner splash, elbow drop.
Brief description: Hype Rockwell, one-half of the tag team N_R_G with Race Jaxon, was a high-energy competitor known for his strength and charisma. Together, they won the CHIKARA Campeonatos de Parejas and became fan favorites for their electrifying performances and cohesive teamwork.

Icarus
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, tag team, and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and aerial elements.
Signature moves: Blu-Ray (pedigree), Wings of Icarus (diving crossbody), Shiranui.
Brief description: Icarus, a CHIKARA original, was one of the promotion’s longest-standing performers. Starting as a villainous member of F.I.S.T., he later transitioned into a heroic role, culminating in a reign as Grand Champion. Known for his incredible storytelling and adaptability, Icarus was a pivotal figure in many of CHIKARA’s top storylines.

Ice Cream Jr.
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy tag team division.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Ice Cream Sandwich (assisted avalanche splash), El Helado (rolling splash), spinning headscissors.
Brief description: Ice Cream Jr., one-half of Los Ice Creams with El Hijo del Ice Cream, was a comedic mainstay in CHIKARA. Their absurd antics and entertaining style made them one of the promotion’s most beloved comedy acts. They frequently participated in King of Trios tournaments and tag team contests.

Incognito
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre and high-flying.
Signature moves: Springboard moonsault, Mexican armdrag, spinning heel kick.
Brief description: Incognito was part of Team Mexico in the 2008 King of Trios tournament, alongside El Pantera and Lince Dorado. His impressive lucha libre style and agility contributed to Team Mexico’s standout performances during the tournament.

Incoherence
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2014 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team and trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox, high-flying, and technical.
Signature moves: Battering Ram, Graveyard Smash, double team senton splash.
Brief description: Incoherence, consisting of Hallowicked and Frightmare (and sometimes Delirious), was a spooky yet fan-favorite team in CHIKARA. Their teamwork and quirky chemistry made them a cornerstone of the tag division. They captured the CHIKARA Campeonatos de Parejas and were key players in trios tournaments and major storylines.

Irish Airborne
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Irish Coffee (assisted DDT), double team superkick, suicide dives.
Brief description: Irish Airborne, composed of brothers Jake and Dave Crist, participated in CHIKARA’s tag team tournaments. Their blend of speed and precision added to the dynamic variety of CHIKARA’s early tag team scene.

Iron Saints
Time in CHIKARA: 2005 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Saints Go Marching (spike piledriver), tandem backbreaker, double clothesline.
Brief description: The Iron Saints, featuring Vito and Sal Thomaselli, competed in CHIKARA’s Tag World Grand Prix tournaments. Known for their gritty style and intense teamwork, they added a tough edge to the tag division during their appearances.

Jack Marciano
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2005 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Knee Lift, diving leg drop, Shining Wizard.
Brief description: Jack Marciano was a key member of the early CHIKARA roster and part of the tag team "The Wildcards" alongside Eddie Kingston. The duo brought an aggressive and no-nonsense style to CHIKARA’s tag division, feuding with teams like The Colony and The Kings of Wrestling.

Jagged
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2013 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic.
Signature moves: Sweet Taste of Professionalism (superkick), Gory Bomb, double team DDT.
Brief description: Jagged, later known as Scott Parker, was one-half of the tag team 3.0 alongside Shane Matthews. They were known for their entertaining promos and comedic in-ring antics, as well as their ability to deliver in high-stakes matches. Jagged was a consistent performer in CHIKARA’s tag and trios divisions, winning the Campeonatos de Parejas.

Jaka
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2018 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Jumanji Bomb (sit-out powerbomb), headbutts, spinning heel kick.
Brief description: Jaka, known for his savage and intense persona, was part of the tag team "The Devastation Corporation" and later became affiliated with other factions. His physicality and aggression made him a force in CHIKARA’s tag team and trios divisions.

Jakob Hammermeier
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Hammerlock DDT, sleeper hold, crossbody.
Brief description: Jakob Hammermeier began as the bumbling announcer and eventual member of Die Bruderschaft des Kreuzes (BDK). Over time, he evolved into a more competent and devious in-ring competitor, engaging in factional rivalries and comedic feuds, solidifying his place in CHIKARA lore.

Jake Crist
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Irish Coffee (assisted DDT), Spanish Fly, springboard cutter.
Brief description: Jake Crist, as part of Irish Airborne with his brother Dave Crist, competed in CHIKARA’s tag team tournaments. Their agile and innovative offense stood out, making them memorable contributors to CHIKARA’s dynamic tag scene.

James Mason
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: European technical.
Signature moves: Cloverleaf, suplex variations, dropkick.
Brief description: James Mason, a seasoned British wrestler, appeared in CHIKARA during the 2011 King of Trios tournament as part of Team UK. His expertise in British technical wrestling added a unique flavor to the tournament, showcasing the global appeal of CHIKARA’s events.

Jasper Tippins
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2018 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Team-based technical wrestling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Tandem Bicycle Kick, synchronized suplexes, comedic roll-ups.
Brief description: Jasper Tippins, one-half of the cycling-themed tag team Dez Peloton alongside Donald Kluger, brought a lighthearted and entertaining style to CHIKARA. Known for their synchronized teamwork and cycling gimmick, Dez Peloton were fan favorites in the tag division.

Jay Briscoe
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical elements.
Signature moves: J-Driller (double underhook piledriver), Froggy Bow (diving elbow drop), superkick.
Brief description: Jay Briscoe, alongside his brother Mark as The Briscoe Brothers, appeared in the 2007 King of Trios tournament. Their hard-hitting, high-energy style brought intensity to the event, showcasing why they were one of the premier tag teams in independent wrestling.

Jay Lethal
Time in CHIKARA: 2006, 2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Lethal Injection (springboard cutter), Hail to the King (diving elbow drop), Lethal Combination (flatliner).
Brief description: Jay Lethal made sporadic appearances in CHIKARA, including participation in tag tournaments and special events. Known for his charisma and well-rounded in-ring style, Lethal was a valuable guest star who elevated any match he competed in.

Jervis Cottonbelly
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team, and comedic wrestler.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical elements.
Signature moves: Gentleman’s Clutch (bridging pin), Hug of Comfort (bear hug), Senton Splash.
Brief description: Known as "The World’s Sweetest Man," Jervis Cottonbelly was a fan-favorite for his gentlemanly demeanor and comedic antics. He often teamed with other quirky characters, such as Princess KimberLee and Los Ice Creams, and played a prominent role in the Crown and Court faction. His lighthearted style and endearing personality made him a beloved figure in CHIKARA.

Jessica Troy
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Fujiwara Armbar, crossbody, German suplex.
Brief description: Jessica Troy, an Australian wrestler, participated in CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments, showcasing her technical expertise and innovative submissions. Known for her calm demeanor and effective offense, she was a strong addition to the roster during her appearances.

Jerry Lynn
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Cradle Piledriver, Tornado DDT, diving leg drop.
Brief description: Jerry Lynn, a veteran of independent wrestling, appeared in CHIKARA during his farewell tour in 2012. Competing in singles matches, Lynn’s experience and technical prowess were on full display, adding prestige to CHIKARA’s events.

Jigsaw
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2013, 2015-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, tag team, and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Jig N’ Tonic (pump-handle driver), Superkick, Diving Double Foot Stomp.
Brief description: Jigsaw was one of CHIKARA’s most consistent performers, known for his incredible in-ring skill and versatility. He was a key member of The Future Is Now faction and The Spectral Envoy, winning multiple King of Trios tournaments and playing a vital role in CHIKARA’s major storylines.

Jimmy Olsen
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2009 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Superkick, moonsault, roll-up variations.
Brief description: Jimmy Olsen, part of The Olsen Twins with Colin Delaney, brought a mix of humor and skill to CHIKARA’s tag division. The duo competed in tournaments and feuded with popular teams like The Colony, adding depth to the tag team scene.

Jinsei Shinzaki
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Japanese technical and striking.
Signature moves: Praying Rope Walk, Gokuraku-Gatame (paradise lock), Michinoku Driver.
Brief description: The legendary Jinsei Shinzaki participated in CHIKARA’s 2010 King of Trios tournament as part of Team Michinoku Pro with Great Sasuke and Dick Togo. His unique style and veteran presence added prestige to the event, captivating fans with his iconic techniques.

Jody Fleisch
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and acrobatic.
Signature moves: 720 DDT, springboard hurricanrana, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Jody Fleisch, a standout from the UK independent scene, appeared in the 2011 King of Trios tournament as part of Team UK. His spectacular aerial offense and innovative moves left a lasting impression on CHIKARA fans.

Joey Janela
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-risk and unpredictable.
Signature moves: Package Piledriver, superkick, diving elbow drop.
Brief description: "The Bad Boy" Joey Janela competed in CHIKARA during his rise on the independent scene, bringing his chaotic and daredevil style to the promotion. Known for his willingness to take risks, Janela delivered memorable performances in singles and multi-person matches.

Joey Ryan
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy mid-card.
Wrestling style: Comedy with traditional and brawling elements.
Signature moves: YouPorn Plex (groin-based suplex), Superkick, lariat.
Brief description: Joey Ryan brought his controversial and humorous style to CHIKARA, often competing in tag team and trios matches. His over-the-top antics provided comedic relief while showcasing his unique in-ring persona.

John Francis of Coronado
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based.
Signature moves: Coronado Clutch (bridging cobra clutch), rolling neckbreaker, suplex variations.
Brief description: John Francis of Coronado was a wealthy, arrogant character who played the quintessential villain in CHIKARA. Known for his technical skill and sharp promos, he participated in major storylines and served as a foil to many fan-favorite wrestlers.

John Silver
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2013 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with agility.
Signature moves: Spinning Doctor Bomb, superkick, running European uppercut.
Brief description: John Silver appeared in CHIKARA as part of The Beaver Boys tag team alongside Alex Reynolds. Known for his explosive power and agility, Silver contributed to CHIKARA’s tag team division with memorable performances in multi-man and tournament matches.

Johnny Gargano
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2013 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Hurts Donut (swinging flatliner), Garga-No-Escape (crossface), superkick.
Brief description: Johnny Gargano was a key member of F.I.S.T., excelling as both a singles and tag team competitor. His time in CHIKARA saw him win high-stakes matches and tournaments, including King of Trios. Gargano’s versatility and charisma solidified him as one of CHIKARA’s most memorable performers.

Johnny Kidd
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: British technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Bridging roll-ups, arm drags, leg locks.
Brief description: Johnny Kidd, a legend of British wrestling, brought his classic style to CHIKARA during special guest appearances, including technical exhibitions against wrestlers like Mike Quackenbush. His mastery of traditional wrestling techniques provided a unique and nostalgic touch to CHIKARA events.

Johnny Saint
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: British technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Double-arm scissors, butterfly suplex, wristlock takedowns.
Brief description: Johnny Saint, a legendary British wrestler, participated in CHIKARA during the 2011 King of Trios tournament as part of Team UK. Renowned for his mastery of catch wrestling, Saint’s appearance brought prestige and a touch of classic wrestling to the promotion.

Jolly Roger
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2005, 2014-2015 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Walking the Plank (DDT), armdrags, dropkick.
Brief description: Jolly Roger, a pirate-themed wrestler, was a part of CHIKARA’s early years and later returned for guest appearances. Often teaming with Lance Steel, Jolly Roger’s comedic yet technically proficient style made him a standout in CHIKARA’s lighthearted roster.

Jojo Bravo
Time in CHIKARA: 2013 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Bravo Bomb (powerbomb), crossbody, armdrag takedowns.
Brief description: Jojo Bravo competed in CHIKARA’s Young Lions Cup tournament, showcasing his energetic and spirited style. Though his tenure in CHIKARA was brief, his charisma and lucha-inspired offense left a positive impression.

Joker
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2007, 2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and brawling.
Signature moves: Joker Driver (modified piledriver), lariat, German suplex.
Brief description: Joker was known for his tough and aggressive style, competing as part of The Blackout faction and in various tag and singles matches. His gritty demeanor and hard-hitting offense made him a unique presence during his time in CHIKARA.

Jon Moxley
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Lower card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Dirty Deeds (double underhook DDT), lariat, cross armbreaker.
Brief description: Before gaining fame in WWE and AEW, Jon Moxley made a brief appearance in CHIKARA in 2008. Known for his unpredictable and chaotic style, Moxley’s early performance hinted at the intensity and charisma he would later become known for.

Jonathan Gresham
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2015 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Octopus Stretch, German Suplex, suicide dive.
Brief description: Jonathan Gresham, a master of technical wrestling, competed in CHIKARA’s singles and multi-man matches. Known for his crisp mat skills and innovative submissions, Gresham’s performances in CHIKARA displayed the excellence that would later define his career.

Jonny Storm
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and acrobatic.
Signature moves: Rewind Hurricanrana, Storm Cradle Driver, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Jonny Storm, a pioneer of the UK high-flying wrestling scene, appeared in the 2011 King of Trios tournament as part of Team UK. His dynamic and flashy offense thrilled fans and added an international flair to the event.

Jorge Rivera
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor, trainer.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre technical.
Signature moves: Rivera Stretch (bridging submission), armdrag variations, armbar.
Brief description: Jorge Rivera, also known as Skayde, made guest appearances as a competitor and trainer in CHIKARA. His lucha libre expertise influenced many CHIKARA wrestlers, and his matches served as a showcase for classic lucha libre techniques.

Josh Alexander
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical elements.
Signature moves: C4 Spike (piledriver), spinning backbreaker, ankle lock.
Brief description: Josh Alexander competed in CHIKARA’s singles and tag divisions, bringing his intense, hard-hitting style to the promotion. Known for his impressive strength and technical ability, he made a mark during his limited time in CHIKARA.

Jordynne Grace
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Grace Driver (Michinoku Driver), bear hug, lariat.
Brief description: Jordynne Grace brought her powerhouse style to CHIKARA, competing in intergender and tag matches. Her blend of strength and agility allowed her to stand out, delivering memorable performances in multi-person contests and tournaments.

JT Dunn
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2014 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Striker with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Death By Elbow (rolling elbow), discus forearm, cutter.
Brief description: JT Dunn competed in CHIKARA during the mid-2010s, showcasing his hard-hitting style and innovative offense. Known for his striking ability, Dunn participated in singles and tag matches, earning recognition for his intensity and precision in the ring.

Juan Francisco de Coronado
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Coronado Clutch (bridging cobra clutch), German suplex, abdominal stretch.
Brief description: Juan Francisco de Coronado was one of CHIKARA’s premier villains, portraying a wealthy aristocrat with an arrogant demeanor. Known for his mat-based style and sharp promos, Coronado reached the pinnacle of CHIKARA by becoming the Grand Champion, engaging in feuds with fan-favorite wrestlers and cementing his legacy in the promotion.

Jushin Thunder Liger
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Liger Bomb (sit-out powerbomb), Shotei Palm Strike, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: The legendary Jushin Thunder Liger appeared in CHIKARA as part of the 2016 King of Trios tournament, teaming with other iconic Japanese wrestlers. His presence added immense prestige to the event, and his iconic moves thrilled fans, celebrating his storied career.

Just A Lot Of Ants
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy tag and trios division.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired comedy.
Signature moves: Ant Hill (team-assisted backdrop), synchronized dives, comedic grapples.
Brief description: Just A Lot Of Ants was a humorous faction in CHIKARA, poking fun at the abundance of ant-themed characters in the promotion. Their antics and exaggerated teamwork provided lighthearted moments during multi-person matches.

KAGETORA
Time in CHIKARA: 2010, 2016 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired Japanese high-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Gurumakakari (roll-up pin), Ikkitousen (jumping knee strike), Tornado Kick.
Brief description: KAGETORA, representing Dragon Gate, competed in CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments. His agile and precise style added an international flavor to the events, showcasing the crossover appeal of Japanese and lucha libre wrestling traditions.

Kana
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong-style striking and submission-based.
Signature moves: Kana Lock (crossface chickenwing), roundhouse kick, German suplex.
Brief description: Kana, now known as Asuka in WWE, brought her hard-hitting style to CHIKARA during her guest appearance. Her technical skills and devastating strikes made an instant impact, contributing to the promotion's legacy of showcasing international talent.

Kaori Yoneyama
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor, trios participant.
Wrestling style: High-flying and comedic with technical elements.
Signature moves: Diving Senton, Yone-Zou (jumping knee strike), rolling armbars.
Brief description: Kaori Yoneyama, a veteran from Japan, appeared in the 2016 King of Trios tournament. Teaming with Japanese legends like Jushin Thunder Liger, her mix of high-flying moves and comedic antics delighted fans, adding depth to the international roster.

Kanjyouro Matsuyama
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Comedy mid-card.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with traditional Japanese elements.
Signature moves: Ink Splash (top rope splash with a brush), exaggerated grapples, roll-ups.
Brief description: Kanjyouro Matsuyama was part of the comedic lineup in the 2010 King of Trios tournament, showcasing his artist-themed gimmick. His humorous approach and unique character provided levity and fun during the event.

Kenbai
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Springboard Armdrag, Diving Crossbody, Moonsault Press.
Brief description: Kenbai competed in the 2016 King of Trios tournament as part of Team Michinoku Pro. His agility and quick-paced offense made him a key part of his team, representing the dynamic style of Michinoku Pro.

Kendo
Time in CHIKARA: No verified documented connection.

Kenji Fukimoto
Time in CHIKARA: No verified documented connection.

Kenny (Omega)
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: One-Winged Angel, V-Trigger Knee, Moonsault Press.
Brief description: Kenny Omega competed in the 2008 King of Trios tournament, representing Manitoba Pro Wrestling. Though early in his career, Omega’s athleticism and charisma stood out, showcasing glimpses of the superstar he would become.

Kerry Awful
Time in CHIKARA: 2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with power-based elements.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Big Boot, Lariat.
Brief description: Kerry Awful, one-half of The Carnies with Nick Iggy, brought a chaotic energy to CHIKARA. Their team blended brawling and storytelling, making them a compelling act during their time in the promotion.

Kevin Condron
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and faction competitor.
Wrestling style: Character-driven with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Cravat Suplex, Running Forearm, Single-Leg Boston Crab.
Brief description: Kevin Condron, also known as Snowflake during his time in The BDK, became a prominent antagonist in CHIKARA’s storylines. His transformation into a leader of disaffected wrestlers created compelling narratives during his tenure.

Kevin Steen
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2010 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Package Piledriver, Steenalizer (Throwing Powerbomb), Cannonball Senton.
Brief description: Kevin Steen participated in CHIKARA’s early events, including Tag World Grand Prix tournaments and special matches. His hard-hitting style and ability to connect with audiences made him a standout performer in his appearances.

Kid Lykos
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Moonsault, Tandem Suplex (with tag partner).
Brief description: Kid Lykos, often teaming with Chris Brookes as part of CCK, brought his high-flying, fast-paced style to CHIKARA. His tag team chemistry and innovative offense made him a standout in multi-man matches and tournaments.

Kikutaro
Time in CHIKARA: 2006, 2010 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Mongolian Chop, Eye Poke, Running Elbow.
Brief description: Kikutaro, a legendary Japanese comedy wrestler, entertained CHIKARA audiences with his humorous antics and impeccable timing. His appearances added levity and fun to the events, perfectly aligning with CHIKARA’s whimsical atmosphere.

Kimber Lee
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Alligator Clutch (bridging pin), German suplex, diving senton.
Brief description: Kimber Lee made history as the first woman to win the CHIKARA Grand Championship, solidifying her place as one of the promotion’s top stars. She was a key member of the Crown and Court faction and regularly competed in intergender matches, earning accolades for her resilience and skill.

Kings of Wrestling (Claudio Castagnoli & Chris Hero)
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2011 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: KRS-One (Cradle Suplex Driver), Giant Swing/Dropkick combo, Roaring Elbow.
Brief description: The Kings of Wrestling, one of the most dominant teams in CHIKARA’s history, were integral to the promotion’s tag division. With Claudio Castagnoli and Chris Hero at the helm, they showcased unmatched chemistry and technical mastery, winning numerous accolades and competing in major feuds, including their battles with F.I.S.T. and The Colony.

Kobald
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Brawling and chaotic.
Signature moves: Demon's Toilet (top rope senton), snap suplex, running splash.
Brief description: Kobald, a goblin-themed wrestler, was a member of The Batiri, one of CHIKARA’s dark and sinister factions. Known for his wild antics and menacing persona, Kobald often participated in trios and multi-man matches, engaging in rivalries with teams like The Colony and The Spectral Envoy.

Kodama
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team and faction member.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with striking elements.
Signature moves: Demon’s Code (double underhook backbreaker), dropkick, enzuigiri.
Brief description: Kodama, another member of The Batiri, brought a mix of precision and aggression to CHIKARA. Frequently teaming with Obariyon, he was a key player in The Batiri’s feuds and participated in multiple King of Trios tournaments, showcasing his dark and intense style.

Kota Ibushi
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking with technical elements.
Signature moves: Golden Star Powerbomb (sit-out powerbomb), Phoenix Splash, roundhouse kick.
Brief description: Kota Ibushi, one of Japan’s premier wrestlers, competed in CHIKARA’s 2012 King of Trios tournament. Teaming with fellow Japanese stars, Ibushi’s incredible athleticism and hard-hitting style left fans in awe, adding prestige to the event.

Kris Statlander
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Big Bang Theory (tombstone slam), 450° splash, roundhouse kick.
Brief description: Kris Statlander, known for her extraterrestrial-themed persona, brought her unique character and impressive in-ring skills to CHIKARA. She competed in intergender and tag matches, showcasing her agility and strength during her tenure.

KUDO
Time in CHIKARA: 2010, 2014 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and high-flying.
Signature moves: Diving Double Knees, Buzzsaw Kick, running knee strike.
Brief description: KUDO, a standout from Japan’s DDT Pro Wrestling, participated in CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments, representing his home promotion. Known for his crisp strikes and explosive offense, KUDO was a fan favorite during his guest appearances.

Kyle O'Reilly
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Armageddon (cross-armbreaker), rolling butterfly suplexes, rebound lariat.
Brief description: Kyle O’Reilly made a brief appearance in CHIKARA, displaying the technical expertise and hard-hitting style that would later define his career. His performances showcased his potential, even in his limited appearances.

La Parka
Time in CHIKARA: 2015 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with comedic and striking elements.
Signature moves: La Parkinator (sunset flip powerbomb), chair-based strikes, corkscrew plancha.
Brief description: The iconic La Parka appeared in CHIKARA during the 2015 King of Trios tournament, representing Mexican lucha libre. Known for his flashy style and comedic antics, his participation added international star power and entertainment to the event.

Lacey
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Implant DDT, snap suplex, diving crossbody.
Brief description: Lacey competed in CHIKARA during its early years, often participating in intergender matches and multi-person events. Known for her technical ability and sharp promos, Lacey added depth to CHIKARA’s diverse roster during her appearances.

Lance Steel
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic and old-school knight gimmick.
Signature moves: Sharpshooter, Camel Clutch, running knee strike.
Brief description: Lance Steel, a time-traveling knight, was a comedic yet skilled wrestler in CHIKARA’s early years. Often teaming with Jolly Roger, he provided both humor and technical wrestling, participating in tournaments and multi-person matches that showcased CHIKARA’s unique blend of storytelling and in-ring action.

Lancelot Bravado
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional and technical tag wrestling.
Signature moves: Gentleman’s Agreement (Powerbomb/Neckbreaker combo), superkick, suplex variations.
Brief description: Lancelot Bravado, one-half of The Bravado Brothers with Harlem Bravado, brought Southern charm and classic tag team tactics to CHIKARA. They participated in King of Trios tournaments and multi-team matches, delivering polished performances that fit CHIKARA’s diverse roster.

Larry Sweeney
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2009 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, singles competitor, and manager.
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic flair.
Signature moves: ’68 Comeback Special (neckbreaker), Sleeper Hold, running elbow.
Brief description: Larry Sweeney, known for his over-the-top personality and sharp promo skills, was a standout in CHIKARA’s early years. As the leader of Sweet ‘n’ Sour International, Sweeney was both a compelling in-ring competitor and a charismatic presence outside the ring. His legacy in CHIKARA is remembered fondly by fans.

Las Chivas Rayadas
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy tag team.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Double team armdrag, comedic pratfalls, hurricanrana.
Brief description: Las Chivas Rayadas, a goat-themed lucha tag team, competed in CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments. Their humor and lucha-inspired moves provided lighthearted entertainment, perfectly aligning with CHIKARA’s whimsical storytelling.

Latin Dragon
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2013 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre.
Signature moves: Dragon Splash (diving splash), corkscrew plancha, springboard armdrag.
Brief description: Latin Dragon brought his lucha libre style to CHIKARA’s singles division, participating in Young Lions Cup tournaments and multi-man matches. His agility and flashy moves entertained fans, though his time in CHIKARA was brief.

Latvian Proud Oak
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Branch Breaker (spinning neckbreaker), tree-themed stomps, roll-ups.
Brief description: Latvian Proud Oak was a tree-themed wrestler and a member of the Crucible faction. Known for his quirky, nature-inspired gimmick and comedic style, he was a unique addition to CHIKARA’s diverse roster, often providing lighthearted moments during matches.

Le Tabarnak de Team (Mathieu St-Jacques & Thomas Dubois)
Time in CHIKARA: 2018 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Brawling with power-based tandem offense.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb, double clothesline, spinebuster.
Brief description: This French-Canadian tag team made a strong impression in CHIKARA with their rugged style and cohesive teamwork. Their no-nonsense approach to wrestling stood out during tournaments and multi-team matches.

Lee Moriarty
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with innovative transitions.
Signature moves: Joint Custody (hammerlock lariat), snap suplex, diving crossbody.
Brief description: Lee Moriarty brought his smooth technical style to CHIKARA in 2019, participating in multi-man matches and showcasing his creativity in the ring. His tenure was brief but memorable, hinting at the potential that would later define his career.

Legion of Rot
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction.
Wrestling style: Dark and chaotic with technical elements.
Signature moves: Triple team splashes, submission holds, brawling tactics.
Brief description: The Legion of Rot was a sinister faction featuring wrestlers like Frightmare, Kobald, and Hallowicked. They were key antagonists in CHIKARA’s dark and supernatural storylines, often feuding with heroic teams and competing in trios tournaments.

Leigh Obstruction
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2015 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Referee and comedic character.
Wrestling style: None (referee role with light physical interactions).
Brief description: Leigh Obstruction served as a comedic referee and occasional character in CHIKARA. Known for his exaggerated officiating style and light-hearted moments, he fit well into CHIKARA’s whimsical storytelling.

Lince Dorado
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2010 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Golden Rewind (handspring stunner), hurricanrana.
Brief description: Lince Dorado was a standout performer in CHIKARA, known for his incredible aerial offense and lucha libre roots. He competed in King of Trios tournaments as part of Team Mexico and The Future Is Now faction. His exciting style and charisma made him a fan favorite.

Lithuanian Snow Troll
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Brawling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Trollplex (German suplex), running splash, comedic roll-ups.
Brief description: The Lithuanian Snow Troll was a member of The Bloc Party, a faction parodying Cold War stereotypes. His comedic antics and outlandish gimmick made him a lighthearted addition to CHIKARA’s roster, often participating in faction-based storylines and multi-man matches.

Los Ice Creams
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy tag team division.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Ice Cream Sandwich (assisted avalanche splash), El Helado (rolling splash), synchronized dropkicks.
Brief description: Los Ice Creams, consisting of El Hijo del Ice Cream and Ice Cream Jr., were one of CHIKARA’s most beloved comedy acts. Known for their absurd antics and entertaining tag team matches, they participated in multiple King of Trios tournaments and feuded with teams like The Colony.

Louis Lyndon
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Dragon Sleeper, springboard armdrag, enzuigiri.
Brief description: Louis Lyndon, often teaming with Flip Kendrick as Aeroform, brought a mix of aerial and technical wrestling to CHIKARA. Known for his smooth offense and innovative style, he competed in tag tournaments and multi-person matches.

Lucas Calhoun
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and faction member.
Wrestling style: Striking and power-based.
Signature moves: Heartthrob Hammer (discus forearm), powerbomb, neckbreaker.
Brief description: Lucas Calhoun, with his Elvis-inspired persona, added a unique flair to CHIKARA. He participated in various factions and feuds, becoming a solid presence in the singles and tag divisions with his blend of power and character-driven storytelling.

Madison Eagles
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor, mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Hellbound (Death Valley Driver), Brainbuster, Yakuza Kick.
Brief description: Madison Eagles, an accomplished Australian wrestler, appeared in CHIKARA during the 2011 King of Trios tournament as part of Team Australia. Her technical prowess and striking ability added depth and international flair to the tournament.

Magno
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high-flying.
Signature moves: Springboard Moonsault, La Magistral Cradle, Hurricanrana.
Brief description: Magno, a skilled luchador, participated in the 2008 King of Trios tournament as part of Team Mexico. His flashy and precise offense showcased the beauty of lucha libre, leaving a memorable impression on fans.

Maine State Posse (Aiden Aggro & DangerKid)
Time in CHIKARA: 2019-2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and high-energy tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double-team suplex, tandem dropkicks, top-rope dives.
Brief description: The Maine State Posse, consisting of Aiden Aggro and DangerKid, brought their tag team chemistry and East Coast grit to CHIKARA. Competing in multi-team matches and tournaments, they displayed a dynamic style that resonated with fans.

Makoto
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor, mid-card.
Wrestling style: Joshi-style striking and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Bridging German Suplex, Roundhouse Kick, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: Makoto, a rising star from Japan, appeared in CHIKARA during the 2011 King of Trios tournament as part of Team Osaka Pro. Her agility and striking technique added an exciting element to the event.

Malachi Jackson
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Springboard Moonsault, Superkick, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Malachi Jackson, the younger brother of Matt and Nick Jackson (The Young Bucks), appeared in the 2010 King of Trios tournament alongside his siblings. His brief stint in CHIKARA showcased his potential and added to the Bucks’ family legacy in the promotion.

Mana the Polynesian Warrior
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2005 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Samoan Drop, diving headbutt, corner splash.
Brief description: Mana the Polynesian Warrior brought a powerful, hard-hitting style to CHIKARA during his appearances. His imposing presence and dynamic in-ring style added a touch of islander wrestling tradition to the promotion’s early years.

Manami Toyota
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2012 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Joshi puroresu with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Japanese Ocean Cyclone Suplex, Missile Dropkick, bridging Dragon Suplex.
Brief description: One of the greatest women’s wrestlers of all time, Manami Toyota competed in CHIKARA during her U.S. tours. She delivered memorable performances in King of Trios and special showcase matches, blending her legendary technical skill with CHIKARA’s storytelling ethos.

Marion Fontaine
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2015 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Mustache Ride (Diving Crossbody), running European uppercut, arm drag.
Brief description: Marion Fontaine, known for his old-timey vaudeville gimmick, entertained fans with his blend of comedic flair and in-ring ability. Competing in singles and tag matches, Fontaine added a theatrical element to CHIKARA’s eclectic roster.

Mark Andrews
Time in CHIKARA: 2014 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Stundog Millionaire (cutter), Shooting Star Press, enzuigiri.
Brief description: Mark Andrews, a Welsh high-flyer, competed in CHIKARA’s 2014 King of Trios tournament as part of Team UK. His agility, innovative offense, and youthful charisma left a lasting impression on fans, furthering the international appeal of CHIKARA.

Mark Angelosetti
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical elements.
Signature moves: Flea Flicker (Death Valley Driver), Football Tackle, bridging German Suplex.
Brief description: Mark Angelosetti, also known as "Mr. Touchdown," was a standout athlete in CHIKARA. Initially a cocky villain, he transitioned into a heroic role, winning the Young Lions Cup and competing in major tag team feuds alongside Dasher Hatfield as part of the Hatfields & McCoy duo. His football-themed persona made him a unique presence in the promotion.

Mark Briscoe
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Froggy Bow (Diving Elbow Drop), Cutthroat Driver, big boot.
Brief description: Mark Briscoe, teaming with his brother Jay as The Briscoe Brothers, participated in the 2007 King of Trios tournament. Known for their intense and hard-hitting style, The Briscoes brought their established reputation to CHIKARA’s tag division, elevating the event with their performances.

Marshe Rockett
Time in CHIKARA: 2008-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and power-based.
Signature moves: Rockett Launch (top rope splash), spinning back elbow, standing dropkick.
Brief description: Marshe Rockett, as part of Da Soul Touchaz, was a dynamic performer in CHIKARA’s trios division. His athleticism and charisma stood out in King of Trios tournaments and faction-based rivalries, adding flair to CHIKARA’s roster.

Marty Jannetty
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Rocker Dropper (leg drop bulldog), Superkick, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: The legendary Marty Jannetty appeared in CHIKARA as part of the 2012 King of Trios tournament. Teaming with The 1-2-3 Kid and Tatanka, Jannetty provided a nostalgic throwback for fans, blending his classic style with CHIKARA’s unique brand of wrestling.

Masaaki Mochizuki
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with strong-style elements.
Signature moves: Twister (leg sweep into an ankle lock), Triangle Kick, Saikyo High Kick.
Brief description: Masaaki Mochizuki, a Dragon Gate legend, competed in CHIKARA during the 2011 King of Trios tournament as part of Team Dragon Gate. His hard-hitting style and precision striking elevated the tournament, showcasing his world-class talent.

Masato Yoshino
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Sol Naciente (modified arm submission), Lightning Spiral (spinning cutter), Sling Blade.
Brief description: Masato Yoshino, known for his incredible speed and agility, appeared in the 2011 King of Trios tournament with Team Dragon Gate. His fast-paced offense and innovative techniques thrilled fans, further cementing CHIKARA’s reputation for hosting top-tier international talent.

Mascara Purpura
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre.
Signature moves: Corkscrew Plancha, Springboard Moonsault, Tilt-a-Whirl Headscissors.
Brief description: Mascara Purpura, a Mexican luchador, competed in CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments, representing Team Mexico. His breathtaking aerial maneuvers and flashy style made him a standout performer during his appearances.

Mascarita Dorada
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre.
Signature moves: Springboard Hurricanrana, Diving Crossbody, Arm Drag Variations.
Brief description: Mascarita Dorada, one of the most famous mini wrestlers in lucha libre, participated in CHIKARA’s 2008 King of Trios tournament. His incredible agility and skill left a lasting impression, delighting fans with his dynamic performances.

Masters of a Thousand Holds
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Bridging pin combinations, arm drag sequences, roll-ups.
Brief description: A tag team formed by technical wrestling specialists, the Masters of a Thousand Holds showcased traditional grappling and submission techniques. Their matches often served as showcases of technical skill, honoring the purest forms of wrestling.

Mat Bomboy
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2004 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Fisherman Suplex, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Mat Bomboy was part of CHIKARA’s early roster, participating in singles and tag matches. While not a mainstay, his contributions helped lay the groundwork for the promotion’s growing reputation in its formative years.

Mathieu St-Jacques
Time in CHIKARA: 2018 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb, Spinebuster, Double Lariat.
Brief description: Mathieu St-Jacques, one-half of Le Tabarnak de Team with Thomas Dubois, brought his physical and aggressive style to CHIKARA. Their rugged teamwork and cohesive offense stood out in tag team and multi-man matches during their appearances.

Matt Classic
Time in CHIKARA: 2009 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Comedy mid-card.
Wrestling style: Old-school grappling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Airplane Spin, Headlock Takedown, Double Axe Handle.
Brief description: Matt Classic, a throwback grappler with a retro wrestling persona, participated in the 2009 King of Trios tournament. His over-the-top homage to 1950s wrestling, paired with his exaggerated old-school techniques, made him a fan favorite.

Matt Cross
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2008, 2014 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and acrobatic.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Handspring Back Elbow, Cartwheel Moonsault.
Brief description: Matt Cross, known for his incredible athleticism and parkour-inspired style, competed in CHIKARA’s King of Trios and other events. His ability to blend aerial and technical moves made him an exciting performer in the promotion.

Matt Jackson
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2010 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: More Bang for Your Buck (combination dive/450 splash), Superkick, Assisted Moonsault.
Brief description: Matt Jackson, one-half of The Young Bucks with Nick Jackson, became a staple of CHIKARA’s tag team scene during their run. Known for their explosive chemistry and innovative offense, The Young Bucks participated in major events like King of Trios, elevating the promotion’s tag team division.

Matt Makowski
Time in CHIKARA: 2019-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: MMA-inspired striking and submissions.
Signature moves: Rear-Naked Choke, Armbar, Roundhouse Kick.
Brief description: Matt Makowski brought his MMA background to CHIKARA, showcasing a unique hybrid style. Known for his precision strikes and effective submission game, he was a promising competitor in CHIKARA’s later years.

Matt Sydal
Time in CHIKARA: 2005 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Standing Moonsault, Hurricanrana.
Brief description: Matt Sydal, later known as Evan Bourne in WWE, appeared in CHIKARA’s Tag World Grand Prix tournament, showcasing his innovative aerial maneuvers and quick-paced offense. His brief time in CHIKARA was a precursor to his success on the global wrestling stage.

Matt Tremont
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Powerbomb, Lariat.
Brief description: Matt Tremont, known for his hardcore wrestling background, brought his gritty and intense style to CHIKARA. Though primarily a deathmatch competitor, Tremont adapted to CHIKARA’s storytelling approach and participated in multi-man matches, showcasing his toughness and passion.

Matt Turner
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with mat-based elements.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Suplex, Armbars, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Matt Turner, a graduate of the CHIKARA Wrestle Factory, competed primarily in tag team and multi-man matches. Though not a prominent name, he contributed to CHIKARA’s early years by showcasing solid technical wrestling skills.

Max Smashmaster
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, tag team, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Death Blow (Assisted Powerbomb), Lariat, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Max Smashmaster was a dominant force in CHIKARA as a member of the Devastation Corporation, alongside Blaster McMassive and Flex Rumblecrunch. Known for his brute strength and destructive offense, Smashmaster helped his team win the 2014 King of Trios tournament, cementing their legacy as one of CHIKARA’s most powerful factions.

Maxime Boyer
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Dragon Suplex, Rolling Elbow, Dropkick.
Brief description: Maxime Boyer, a Canadian wrestler, competed in CHIKARA during its Tag World Grand Prix tournaments and various singles matches. His crisp technical ability and hard-hitting style made him a solid competitor during his time in the promotion.

Maximos (Joel Maximo & Wil Maximo)
Time in CHIKARA: 2005 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: Spanish Fly, Springboard Moonsault, Hurricanrana.
Brief description: The Maximos, also known as The SAT (Spanish Announce Team), brought their innovative tag team style to CHIKARA’s early tournaments. Known for their creation of the Spanish Fly move, their flashy and high-risk offense entertained fans and elevated the tag team division.

Mecha Mummy
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2005 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Parody with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Mummy Slam (chokeslam), Double Axe Handle, comedic antics.
Brief description: Mecha Mummy was a robotic-themed comedic wrestler who embodied CHIKARA’s playful side. Known for his over-the-top gimmick and entertaining matches, Mecha Mummy became a cult favorite in the promotion’s early years.

Meiko Satomura
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Joshi puroresu with strong-style elements.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Cartwheel Knee Drop, Scorpio Rising (axe kick).
Brief description: Meiko Satomura, one of the most revered joshi wrestlers, competed in CHIKARA during the 2012 King of Trios tournament. Her powerful strikes, technical skill, and aura of dominance added immense prestige to the event, furthering CHIKARA’s tradition of featuring international talent.

Men at Work (Icarus & Shane Storm)
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2006 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, synchronized dropkicks, humorous grapples.
Brief description: Men at Work, a blue-collar construction-themed tag team, provided comedic entertainment in CHIKARA’s early tag division. Their goofy gimmick and in-ring antics made them memorable, especially in multi-team matches and tournaments.

Mercedes Martinez
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based and technical.
Signature moves: Fisherman Buster, Spinebuster, Saito Suplex.
Brief description: Mercedes Martinez, one of the most accomplished female wrestlers in independent wrestling, competed in CHIKARA during the 2010 King of Trios tournament. Her commanding presence and impactful offense were highlights of the event, showcasing her strength and skill.

Merlok
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with agility.
Signature moves: Tidal Wave (splash), Powerslam, Samoan Drop.
Brief description: Merlok was a monstrous force in CHIKARA, often affiliated with The Crucible faction. Known for his imposing size and surprising agility, Merlok was a dominant presence in the singles division, frequently overpowering his opponents.

Mick Moretti
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with unorthodox and comedic elements.
Signature moves: Sliding Flatliner, Superkick, Senton Bomb.
Brief description: Mick Moretti, an eccentric and unpredictable performer from Australia, competed in CHIKARA as part of The Nations faction. His unconventional movements and dynamic offense made him a standout during his appearances, particularly in the 2018 and 2019 King of Trios tournaments.

Mickie Knuckles
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and striking.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Spinning Backfist, German Suplex.
Brief description: Mickie Knuckles brought her hard-hitting and intense style to CHIKARA during her guest appearance in 2008. Known for her toughness and brawling ability, she participated in intergender matches, showcasing her resilience and versatility.

Mike Bailey
Time in CHIKARA: 2015 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and high-flying.
Signature moves: Ultima Weapon (Shooting Star Double Knee Drop), Tornado Kick, Moonsault.
Brief description: "Speedball" Mike Bailey brought his high-energy and kick-heavy style to CHIKARA during his appearances in 2015. Competing in singles and multi-man matches, Bailey’s innovative offense and relentless pace made him a fan favorite.

Mike Draztik
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and power-based tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Spanish Fly, Superkick, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Mike Draztik, one-half of EYFBO (later known as Proud-N-Powerful), competed in CHIKARA’s tag and trios divisions. Alongside Angel Ortiz, Draztik showcased dynamic teamwork and high-impact moves, contributing to the strength of CHIKARA’s tag team roster.

Mike Quackenbush
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2020 (founder and regular competitor).
Position on the card: Main event, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and lucha libre hybrid.
Signature moves: Quackendriver (various versions of a cradle piledriver), Black Tornado Slam, Lightning Lock Beta.
Brief description: Mike Quackenbush, the founder of CHIKARA, was the promotion’s heart and soul. Known for his innovative in-ring style and storytelling, Quackenbush competed in numerous high-profile matches and feuds. He was instrumental in training many CHIKARA wrestlers and played a central role in its history, both in and out of the ring.

Mike Sydal
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Standing Moonsault, Leg Lariat, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Mike Sydal, the younger brother of Matt Sydal, showcased his athleticism and agility in CHIKARA. His fluid movements and dynamic offense made him a strong addition to multi-man matches and tournaments during his appearances.

Milano Collection AT
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and flamboyant.
Signature moves: Paradise Lock, Italian Stretch #32, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Milano Collection AT, a highly skilled and charismatic Japanese wrestler, competed in the 2010 King of Trios tournament as part of Team Big Japan. His elegant and theatrical style, coupled with his exceptional technical ability, made his performance a highlight of the event.

Millie McKenzie
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Cutter, Spear.
Brief description: Millie McKenzie, a rising star from the UK, brought her hard-hitting and no-nonsense style to CHIKARA during the 2019 King of Trios tournament. Her blend of strength and technique impressed fans, further elevating her profile internationally.

Missile Assault Ant
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2015 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Missile Launcher (Running Powerslam), Running European Uppercut, Backdrop Suplex.
Brief description: Missile Assault Ant was a militaristic member of the Colony: Xtreme Force. His no-nonsense demeanor and brute strength were a contrast to the more heroic original Colony members, leading to conflicts that became part of CHIKARA’s factional storylines.

Missile Assault Man
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking elements.
Signature moves: Missile Launcher (Powerslam), Missile Bomb (Suplex Slam), European Uppercut.
Brief description: After evolving from his "Ant" persona, Missile Assault Man dropped the insect gimmick and adopted a more serious demeanor. He became a standout competitor in CHIKARA, transitioning into singles competition and participating in major storylines and tournaments.

Mister ZERO
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2005, 2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and old-school.
Signature moves: Last Shaven Unicorn Drop (suplex variation), Leg Drop, Figure-Four Leglock.
Brief description: Mister ZERO was a CHIKARA original, known for his stoic demeanor and clean-cut style. Often teaming with Shane Storm as Men at Work, he provided humor and technical skill during CHIKARA’s early years, later making occasional returns for special events.

Mitch Ryder
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2008 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and faction member.
Wrestling style: Southern-style brawling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Rolling Elbow, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Mitch Ryder was a traditional Southern wrestler who aligned with The Fabulous Two, embodying an arrogant and old-school persona. His feuds with fan favorites like The Colony and F.I.S.T. added a classic wrestling flavor to CHIKARA’s eclectic roster.

Mixed Martial Archie
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Parody of MMA with comedic elements.
Signature moves: MMA Punches, Rear Naked Choke, comedic submissions.
Brief description: Mixed Martial Archie was a comedic evolution of the Archibald Peck character, parodying MMA culture. Known for his absurd promos and hilarious antics, Archie brought levity to CHIKARA’s events while entertaining fans with his over-the-top commitment to his gimmick.

MIYAWAKI
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2009 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong-style with technical elements.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Fisherman Suplex, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: MIYAWAKI, a Japanese wrestler from K-DOJO, was a frequent guest in CHIKARA. Known for his solid technique and hard-hitting style, he teamed with Yoshiaki Yago and KUDO in King of Trios tournaments and participated in several memorable matches, leaving a strong impression during his appearances.

Mokujin Ken
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Parody with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Wooden Chop, Tree Slam, comedic grapples.
Brief description: Mokujin Ken was a wooden mannequin-themed wrestler, inspired by Tekken’s Mokujin character. His comedic antics and exaggerated movements made him a lighthearted addition to CHIKARA’s roster, often used in matches to entertain fans with humor.

Molly McCoy
Time in CHIKARA: 2019-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling and striking.
Signature moves: Penalty Kick, Spear, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Molly McCoy, an ice hockey-themed wrestler, was known for their aggressive and scrappy style. A member of The Proteus Wheel, they brought a unique personality to CHIKARA, participating in tag team matches and contributing to factional storylines.

Moscow the Communist Bovine
Time in CHIKARA: 2008-2010 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Power-based with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Cowplex (Belly-to-Belly Suplex), Big Moo Splash, Milk Stunner.
Brief description: Moscow the Communist Bovine was a cow-themed wrestler parodying Cold War stereotypes. A member of The Colony’s extended roster, Moscow provided comedic relief and participated in multi-person matches, delighting fans with his absurd gimmick.

Moustache Mountain (Trent Seven & Tyler Bate)
Time in CHIKARA: 2017 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with power-based teamwork.
Signature moves: Assisted Dragon Suplex, Lariat/German Suplex combo, Double Underhook Powerbomb.
Brief description: Moustache Mountain, the popular British Strong Style tag team, competed in CHIKARA’s 2017 King of Trios tournament. Their charisma, teamwork, and hard-hitting offense made them stand out as fan favorites in the event.

Mr. Azerbaijan
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Azerbaijani Clutch (Camel Clutch), Lariat, Scoop Slam.
Brief description: Mr. Azerbaijan was a proud and patriotic member of The Bloc Party, a faction inspired by Cold War-era stereotypes. Known for his over-the-top promos and comedic moments, he was a central figure in factional rivalries during his time in CHIKARA.

Mysterious and Handsome Stranger
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with comedic flair.
Signature moves: Top Rope Bulldog, Stranger Danger (Superkick), comedic distractions.
Brief description: A cowboy-themed alter ego of Archibald Peck, the Mysterious and Handsome Stranger brought humor and mystery to CHIKARA. His matches often featured comedic storytelling, making him a unique and entertaining addition to the roster during his brief run.

N_R_G (Hype Rockwell & Race Jaxon)
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division, mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-energy and power-based tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Slam Dunk (Spinning Sit-Out Powerbomb), Double Team Crossbody, Assisted Suplex.
Brief description: N_R_G was a high-energy tag team that quickly became a fan favorite. Combining Race Jaxon’s agility with Hype Rockwell’s strength, the duo captured the CHIKARA Campeonatos de Parejas and participated in significant feuds and tournaments, leaving a lasting impression.

Naruki Doi
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Muscular Bomb (Modified Powerbomb), Sliding Kick, Bakatare Sliding Kick.
Brief description: Naruki Doi, a top Dragon Gate star, competed in the 2011 King of Trios tournament as part of Team Dragon Gate. His precise offense, athleticism, and experience elevated the tournament, making him a standout guest competitor.

Nations (Mick Moretti, Jack Bonza, and Adam Hoffman)
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2019 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Triple Suplex, Tandem Powerbombs, Running Strikes.
Brief description: Representing Australia, The Nations brought their unique mix of styles to CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments. Their chemistry and cohesive teamwork made them a competitive unit and showcased the global appeal of CHIKARA.

Necro Butcher
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Hardcore brawling.
Signature moves: Tiger Driver, Death Valley Driver, Headbutts.
Brief description: Necro Butcher, a hardcore wrestling icon, made a brief appearance in CHIKARA during the Tag World Grand Prix. Known for his chaotic and brutal style, Necro brought a hardcore edge to CHIKARA’s usually lighthearted atmosphere.

Nevaeh
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Cutter, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Nevaeh, often teaming with her partner Jake Crist, competed in CHIKARA’s tag and trios divisions. Her versatile style and solid in-ring skills made her a dependable performer in multi-person matches and tournaments.

Nick Gage
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and striking.
Signature moves: Chokebreaker (chokeslam into a backbreaker), Death Valley Driver, Piledriver.
Brief description: Nick Gage, known for his hardcore wrestling background, brought his gritty and intense persona to CHIKARA during his appearance in the 2008 King of Trios tournament. His violent style was a stark contrast to CHIKARA’s usual tone, providing a unique dynamic.

Nick Jackson
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2010 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: More Bang for Your Buck (combination moonsault and 450 splash), Superkick, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Nick Jackson, one-half of The Young Bucks with his brother Matt Jackson, was a regular in CHIKARA’s tag division. Their innovative tandem offense and charisma made them a staple of CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments, elevating the promotion’s reputation for top-tier tag team wrestling.

Nightmare Warriors
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, faction.
Wrestling style: Dark and technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Group-assisted suplexes, trios attacks, submissions.
Brief description: The Nightmare Warriors, consisting of Hallowicked, Frightmare, Silver Ant, and others, were a faction of dark, brooding characters aligned against CHIKARA’s heroes. They were heavily involved in major storylines, including the ongoing conflict with The Flood, and were central to CHIKARA’s supernatural elements and faction warfare.

Nikki Roxx
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Barbie Crusher (Fireman’s Carry Cutter), Snap Suplex, Clothesline.
Brief description: Nikki Roxx appeared in CHIKARA during the 2008 Tag World Grand Prix, showcasing her power and technical wrestling skills. Known for her strength and charisma, she contributed to the promotion’s growing focus on intergender competition.

North Star Express (Darin Corbin & Ryan Cruz)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division, mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and comedic tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Cruz Control (assisted suplex), synchronized dropkicks, tandem dive sequences.
Brief description: The North Star Express, a charismatic and comedic tag team, participated in CHIKARA’s Tag World Grand Prix and other events. Their entertaining style and strong teamwork made them a fan-favorite act during their appearances.

Nouveau Aesthetic (Still Life with Apricots and Pears & BLANK)
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical with character-driven storytelling.
Signature moves: Art Gallery (combination DDT and slam), submissions, corner strikes.
Brief description: Nouveau Aesthetic was an artistic and avant-garde tag team focused on unique character presentation and in-ring storytelling. Their elaborate personas and cohesive teamwork made them stand out in CHIKARA’s tag team division.

Nøkken
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2015 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Chokeslam, Powerslam, Avalanche Splash.
Brief description: Nøkken, a towering and menacing figure, was part of The Flood, a faction aimed at dismantling CHIKARA. Known for his size and strength, he played a significant role in factional warfare and was a formidable opponent in multi-man matches.

Obariyon
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team, and faction member.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with striking and dark character elements.
Signature moves: Sixth Dimension (snapmare driver), Diving Double Stomp, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Obariyon, a member of The Batiri, was a key part of CHIKARA’s supernatural-themed faction wars. Often teaming with Kodama and Kobald, Obariyon’s unique mix of speed and intensity made him a standout in trios matches and major storylines involving The Batiri and their rivals.

Oceanea
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2019 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction leader.
Wrestling style: Technical with character-driven storytelling.
Signature moves: Tidal Wave (corner splash), Neckbreaker, Submission Locks.
Brief description: Oceanea, formerly known as Ashley Vox, became the leader of The Proteus Wheel, a faction with an aquatic theme. Her sinister transformation brought a darker edge to her performances, and her character-driven storytelling was central to The Proteus Wheel’s feuds and matches.

Odditorium
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction competitors.
Wrestling style: Chaotic and character-focused.
Signature moves: Group-assisted slams, brawling tactics, distraction-based offense.
Brief description: The Odditorium, led by Oliver Grimsly, was a macabre faction with circus-inspired personas. Known for their theatricality and unorthodox behavior, they were an entertaining and eerie presence in CHIKARA’s factional rivalries, often pitted against more traditional heroes.

Officer Warren Barksdale
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Cuff Lock (sleeper hold), Patrol Slam (scoop slam), Double Axe Handle.
Brief description: Officer Warren Barksdale was a law enforcement-themed wrestler who blended humor with solid wrestling skills. Often involved in lighthearted rivalries and multi-man matches, his character added comedic flair to CHIKARA’s events.

Old Fashioned (Jervis Cottonbelly & Sonny Defarge)
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Traditional and comedy wrestling.
Signature moves: Gentlemen’s Slam (assisted slam), Double Clothesline, Submission Holds.
Brief description: Old Fashioned combined the whimsical charm of Jervis Cottonbelly with the straight-laced persona of Sonny Defarge. Together, they embodied an old-school wrestling aesthetic while entertaining fans with their humor and cohesive teamwork.

Oleg The Usurper
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and faction member.
Wrestling style: Power-based with character-driven storytelling.
Signature moves: Off With His Head (running cannonball), Viking Slam, Big Splash.
Brief description: Oleg The Usurper, a Viking warrior with a comedic edge, was a prominent character in CHIKARA. Initially aligned with The Flood, he later transitioned into a more heroic role. His mix of brute strength and humorous antics made him a unique and entertaining part of the roster.

Oliver Grimsly
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction leader.
Wrestling style: Technical with character-based antics.
Signature moves: Curtain Call (Swinging Neckbreaker), Dropkick, Submission Holds.
Brief description: As the leader of The Odditorium, Oliver Grimsly brought a theatrical and eerie presence to CHIKARA. His captivating persona and unique style made him a central figure in the faction’s feuds, often utilizing distractions and underhanded tactics to gain the upper hand.

Olsen Twins (Colin Olsen & Jimmy Olsen)
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2008 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Superkick, Double Team Moonsault, Assisted Suplex.
Brief description: The Olsen Twins were a brotherly duo known for their humor and strong teamwork. They were staples of CHIKARA’s early tag division, often feuding with teams like The Colony and participating in tournaments like Tag World Grand Prix.

Ophidian
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, tag team, and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Death Grip (cobra clutch), Ophidian Twist (spinning neckbreaker), Egyptian Destroyer (front flip piledriver).
Brief description: Ophidian, a serpent-themed wrestler, was a founding member of The Osirian Portal. Known for his hypnotic abilities and fluid in-ring style, he participated in many major CHIKARA events, including King of Trios tournaments, and later became involved in darker, more sinister storylines as a solo competitor.

Orange Cassidy
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2018 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and faction member.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Orange Punch (Superman Punch), Lazy Splash, Sloth Hold (slow-motion submission).
Brief description: Before his mainstream breakout, Orange Cassidy developed his laid-back, comedic persona in CHIKARA. As a member of The Gentleman’s Club, he combined humor with surprisingly sharp technical skills, earning him a unique and enduring spot in CHIKARA’s roster.

Orbit Adventure Ant
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2015 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Satellite Slam, Diving Crossbody, Spinning Headscissors.
Brief description: Orbit Adventure Ant was a member of The Colony: Xtreme Force, a more exaggerated and villainous offshoot of The Colony. His space explorer-themed persona and high-flying moves added a unique flair to CHIKARA’s already colorful roster.

Order of the Neo Solar Temple
Time in CHIKARA: 2003-2013 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction.
Wrestling style: Dark and theatrical with technical elements.
Signature moves: Cosmic Doom (team-assisted slam), Hypnotic Rituals, Brawling tactics.
Brief description: The Order of the Neo Solar Temple, led by UltraMantis Black, was a dark and mysterious faction that often served as a central antagonist in CHIKARA. With members like Crossbones, Hydra, and Delirious, the group was known for their occult themes and entertaining rivalries.

Osirian Portal (Ophidian & Amasis)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2015, 2018 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with acrobatics and technical elements.
Signature moves: Osirian Sacrament (assisted 450 splash), Pyramid Suplex (bridging suplex), synchronized hypnotic dancing.
Brief description: The Osirian Portal was one of CHIKARA’s most beloved tag teams, blending incredible athleticism with humor and unique Egyptian-themed characters. They became fixtures in King of Trios tournaments and were involved in memorable feuds and matches that showcased their innovative style.

Oswald Project
Time in CHIKARA: 2019-2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Agile with a contortionist-inspired gimmick.
Signature moves: Stretching Suplex, Rolling Splash, Submission Holds.
Brief description: Oswald Project was a unique wrestler with a contortionist gimmick that emphasized flexibility and creativity in the ring. His unusual movements and unconventional offense made him a distinctive presence in CHIKARA’s later years.

PAC (formerly Neville)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Black Arrow (Corkscrew Shooting Star Press), 450 Splash, Moonsault.
Brief description: Before achieving global fame, PAC competed in CHIKARA as part of King of Trios tournaments and various singles matches. His high-octane aerial style and precision maneuvers thrilled fans, cementing his reputation as one of the most exciting high-flyers in wrestling.

Paris De Silva
Time in CHIKARA: 2018 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Springboard Moonsault, Hurricanrana, 450 Splash.
Brief description: Paris De Silva, one-half of The Velocities, showcased his agility and quickness in CHIKARA’s 2018 King of Trios tournament. His dynamic style added excitement to the event and highlighted his potential as an international talent.

Pelle Primeau
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on grappling.
Signature moves: Sharpshooter, Arm Drag, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Pelle Primeau competed in CHIKARA during the mid-2000s, participating in singles and multi-person matches. Known for his underdog spirit and technical skills, he added variety to CHIKARA’s roster during his tenure.

Penelope Ford
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with striking elements.
Signature moves: Stunner, Handspring Elbow, Bridging Suplex.
Brief description: Penelope Ford made an impact in CHIKARA with her athleticism and charisma. Competing in singles matches and intergender bouts, she quickly became a fan favorite for her energetic performances.

Pete Dunne
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2017 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Bitter End (Pumphandle Flatliner), Finger Snap, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Pete Dunne, representing British Strong Style, competed in CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments. Known for his intense, technical style and hard-hitting offense, he delivered standout performances that added international prestige to CHIKARA’s roster.

Portia Perez
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with a touch of brawling.
Signature moves: Superkick, Cross Armbreaker, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Portia Perez, known for her fierce and devious persona, frequently competed in CHIKARA’s women’s and intergender divisions. She was part of several memorable matches and events, showcasing her technical prowess and sharp wit.

Prakash Sabar
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Bollywood Blockbuster (springboard arm drag), Tilt-a-Whirl Headscissors, Moonsault.
Brief description: Prakash Sabar, a member of The Bloc Party, brought a Bollywood-inspired character to CHIKARA. Known for his comedic antics and high-energy matches, he was a colorful and entertaining addition to factional rivalries.

Princess KimberLee
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, singles, and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Alligator Clutch (bridging pin), German Suplex, Diving Senton.
Brief description: Princess KimberLee made history in CHIKARA as the first woman to win the Grand Championship, breaking barriers in intergender wrestling. A key member of The Crown and Court faction, she was beloved for her skill, resilience, and captivating persona, becoming one of the most accomplished performers in CHIKARA’s history.

Proletariat Boar of Moldova
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Boar Gore (running spear), Powerslam, Elbow Drop.
Brief description: The Proletariat Boar of Moldova was a patriotic member of The Bloc Party faction, using his strength and comedic gimmick to entertain fans. His unique character and involvement in factional feuds made him a memorable part of CHIKARA’s colorful roster.

Proteus Wheel
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, faction.
Wrestling style: Power-based with dark, character-driven storytelling.
Signature moves: Group-assisted slams, submission holds, trios teamwork.
Brief description: The Proteus Wheel, led by Oceanea, was a sinister faction composed of monstrous wrestlers like Callux the Castigator and others. Their unique look and destructive tactics made them one of the most menacing groups in CHIKARA, often engaging in feuds with heroic factions like The Colony and The Crucible.

Puma King
Time in CHIKARA: 2018 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Cat Nap (springboard moonsault), Tilt-a-Whirl Backbreaker, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Puma King, a charismatic Mexican luchador, brought his feline-themed character to CHIKARA during the 2018 King of Trios tournament. Known for his agility and entertaining personality, Puma King’s appearances highlighted the international flavor of CHIKARA events.

Qefka the Quiet
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox and character-driven.
Signature moves: Silent Slam (chokeslam), Submission Locks, Strikes.
Brief description: Qefka the Quiet was a mime-inspired wrestler who incorporated silence and pantomime into his in-ring style. His unique gimmick and creative storytelling made him a standout performer in CHIKARA’s later years, blending humor and intrigue in his matches.

QT Marshall
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with power-based elements.
Signature moves: QT Special (spinning facebuster), Suplex Variations, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: QT Marshall competed in CHIKARA during the early 2010s, showcasing his technical skills and solid in-ring abilities. While his time in CHIKARA was limited, he contributed to multi-man matches and tournaments, displaying his versatility as a competitor.

Race Jaxon
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Superkick, Diving Crossbody, Springboard Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Race Jaxon was one-half of the tag team N_R_G alongside Hype Rockwell. Known for his athleticism and energetic persona, Jaxon helped his team capture the CHIKARA Campeonatos de Parejas and was involved in several major feuds and tournaments.

Rain
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Raindrop (Snapmare Driver), Double Knee Strike, Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Rain competed in CHIKARA during the 2007 Tag World Grand Prix. Known for her polished technical skills and sharp in-ring presence, she made a strong impression in her limited appearances.

Razerhawk
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Falcon Arrow, Moonsault, Headscissors Takedown.
Brief description: Razerhawk, a member of The Cyberhawks 2000, brought a futuristic and high-energy persona to CHIKARA. Known for his aerial prowess and crowd-pleasing style, he participated in trios tournaments and faction-based feuds, becoming a favorite among fans.

Reckless Youth
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2004 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Bomb, Superkick, Bridging German Suplex.
Brief description: Reckless Youth was one of CHIKARA’s founding wrestlers and a key figure in its early years. Known for his innovative style and strong technical skills, he was instrumental in shaping the promotion’s identity and elevating its reputation within the independent wrestling scene.

Retail Dragon
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2005 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Dragon Splash, Armdrag Variations, Dropkick.
Brief description: Retail Dragon was a masked competitor with a humorous retail store employee gimmick. Known for his comedic antics and lucha-inspired style, he was part of CHIKARA’s early roster, providing lighthearted entertainment during his tenure.

Rey Bucanero
Time in CHIKARA: 2015 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Somersault Senton, Tornado DDT, Boston Crab.
Brief description: Rey Bucanero, a legend in Mexican wrestling, competed in CHIKARA during the 2015 King of Trios tournament as part of Team AAA. His charismatic personality and classic lucha libre techniques added an international flair to the event, delighting fans.

Rich Mahogany
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2013 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Character-driven with technical elements.
Signature moves: Mahogany Meltdown (Spinning Slam), Snap Suplex, Dropkick.
Brief description: Rich Mahogany, a wrestler with a suave and stylish persona, brought humor and flair to CHIKARA’s roster. While primarily a comedic act, his matches showcased solid wrestling fundamentals, making him a memorable part of CHIKARA’s mid-2010s lineup.

Rich Swann
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with striking elements.
Signature moves: Standing 450 Splash, Lethal Injection (handspring cutter), Frog Splash.
Brief description: Rich Swann competed in CHIKARA as a dynamic and charismatic performer, showcasing his aerial skills and high-energy offense. He participated in multi-man matches and tournaments, leaving a lasting impression with his athleticism and charisma.

Rick Roland
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Power-based with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Roland Rack (torture rack), Powerslam, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Rick Roland was a member of The Proteus Wheel, a faction of monstrous wrestlers. His imposing size and brute strength made him a formidable competitor in trios matches and faction rivalries, contributing to the group’s fearsome reputation.

Ricky Reyes
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Dragon Sleeper, Brainbuster, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Ricky Reyes competed in CHIKARA during its early years, bringing a hard-hitting and mat-based style to the roster. Known for his no-nonsense approach, Reyes was a reliable performer in both singles and multi-person matches.

Ricochet
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2011 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and acrobatic.
Signature moves: 630 Splash, Double Moonsault, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Ricochet, one of the most innovative high-flyers in wrestling, competed in CHIKARA during his rise on the independent scene. Known for his incredible agility and aerial maneuvers, Ricochet was a standout in tournaments like King of Trios and Tag World Grand Prix, captivating fans with his jaw-dropping performances.

Ring Crew Express (Dunn & Marcos)
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Assisted Senton, Suplex Variations, Tandem Dropkicks.
Brief description: The Ring Crew Express, known for their underdog spirit and comedic antics, were a tag team that frequently competed in CHIKARA’s tournaments and tag division. Their humor and teamwork made them a fun addition to the roster.

Robbie Brookside
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional British technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Butterfly Suplex, Bridging Roll-Up, European Uppercut.
Brief description: A veteran of British wrestling, Robbie Brookside participated in CHIKARA’s 2012 King of Trios tournament as part of Team UK. His classic style and vast experience brought a unique element to the event, showcasing the timeless art of British grappling.

Robbie Eagles
Time in CHIKARA: 2018 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Turbo Backpack (Backpack Stunner), 450 Splash, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Robbie Eagles, a standout from Australia, competed in CHIKARA’s 2018 King of Trios tournament as part of The Nations. His agility and precision striking were highlights of the event, earning him recognition as a top international talent.

Robbie Ellis
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2005, 2010 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Old-school technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Sunset Flip, Leg Drop, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Robbie Ellis, an older competitor with an art-dealer gimmick, brought a comedic and nostalgic charm to CHIKARA. Known for his old-school techniques and entertaining persona, he added variety to the promotion’s colorful roster.

Robert Anthony
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2010 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, German Suplex, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Robert Anthony competed in CHIKARA during the late 2000s, participating in singles matches and tournaments. Known for his solid in-ring abilities and imposing presence, he delivered strong performances in his limited appearances.

Rockstar Spud
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Underdog (Tilt-a-Whirl Stunner), Diving Crossbody, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Rockstar Spud, known for his flamboyant personality and underdog spirit, appeared in CHIKARA’s 2011 King of Trios tournament as part of Team UK. His charisma and entertaining style made him a memorable part of the event.

Rorschach
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2004 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and agile elements.
Signature moves: Rorschach Test (Springboard Neckbreaker), Diving Elbow Drop, Armbar.
Brief description: Rorschach, a masked wrestler with a mysterious persona, was a fixture in CHIKARA’s early years. Known for his technical skill and enigmatic character, he participated in singles matches and was a key part of CHIKARA’s formative roster.

Rory Gulak
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Cloverleaf, Snap Suplex, Northern Lights Suplex.
Brief description: Rory Gulak, the younger brother of Drew Gulak, brought his mat-based technical wrestling style to CHIKARA. He competed in singles and tag matches, contributing his grappling expertise to the promotion’s diverse roster.

Roxie Cotton
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Cotton Candy Cutter (Ace Crusher), Hair-Pull Takedown, Leg Drop.
Brief description: Roxie Cotton, a wrestler with a bubbly personality and comedic style, participated in women’s and intergender matches in CHIKARA. Her lighthearted approach added humor and fun to the promotion’s mid-2000s era.

Ruckus
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2009 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and brawling.
Signature moves: Razzle Dazzle (rolling corner splash), 450 Splash, Moonsault Leg Drop.
Brief description: Ruckus, known for his flashy and innovative style, competed in CHIKARA as a member of The Blackout faction. His high-energy offense and dynamic charisma made him a standout in singles and multi-man matches.

Rumblebees (Solo Darling & Travis Huckabee)
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2019 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of technical and high-flying wrestling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Honeycomb Hold (submission), Assisted Splash, Dropkick.
Brief description: The Rumblebees were a popular intergender tag team, blending Solo Darling’s bubbly personality with Travis Huckabee’s technical skill. Their unique chemistry and teamwork made them a beloved act in CHIKARA’s tag team division.

Ryan Cruz
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Assisted Senton, Diving Elbow, Moonsault.
Brief description: Ryan Cruz, one-half of The North Star Express with Darin Corbin, was a charismatic tag team performer in CHIKARA. Their comedic antics and strong teamwork made them memorable participants in tag tournaments and multi-team matches.

Sabian
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2009 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying with striking elements.
Signature moves: Black Jesus Stomp (Diving Double Stomp), 450 Splash, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Sabian, also known as BLK Jeez, was a founding member of The Blackout faction in CHIKARA. Known for his athleticism and innovative offense, he played a key role in faction rivalries and multi-man matches, showcasing his charisma and high-flying ability.

Sal Rinauro
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, Crossbody, Arm Drag Variations.
Brief description: Sal Rinauro appeared in CHIKARA during the Tag World Grand Prix, showcasing his agility and charisma. Often competing in tag team matches, his performances contributed to CHIKARA’s growing reputation for hosting dynamic and innovative tag teams.

Sal Thomaselli
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Lariat, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Sal Thomaselli, part of The Iron Saints, competed in CHIKARA’s tag division. Known for his toughness and strong teamwork with his brothers, he added a physical edge to the promotion’s early tag tournaments.

Sami Callihan
Time in CHIKARA: 2008-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and submission-based with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Stretch Muffler (Leg Submission), Forearm Smash, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Sami Callihan brought his intense and hard-hitting style to CHIKARA, participating in both singles and multi-person matches. His aggressive persona and strong performances made him a standout in his appearances, highlighting his future potential.

Sara Del Rey
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2012 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with power-based elements.
Signature moves: Royal Butterfly (Double Underhook Suplex), Koppu Kick, Death Rey Driver.
Brief description: Sara Del Rey, a trailblazer in women’s wrestling, was one of CHIKARA’s most respected competitors. Often competing in intergender matches, she was instrumental in elevating the women’s division and was part of major storylines, including her role in The BDK faction. She remains one of the most accomplished wrestlers in CHIKARA’s history.

SAT (Spanish Announce Team - Joel & Wil Maximo)
Time in CHIKARA: 2005 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Spanish Fly, Springboard Moonsault, Assisted Hurricanrana.
Brief description: Joel and Wil Maximo, known as the SAT, brought their innovative style to CHIKARA during the Tag World Grand Prix. Credited with popularizing the Spanish Fly move, their flashy offense made them a dynamic addition to CHIKARA’s early tag division.

Saturyne
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2013 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Skyward Sword (Diving Splash), Hurricanrana, Spinning Armdrag.
Brief description: Saturyne, a masked high-flyer, was CHIKARA’s resident superheroine. Known for her athleticism and dynamic moves, she competed in both singles and trios matches, providing exciting performances during her tenure.

Scott Parker
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2010, 2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Assisted Moonsault, Tandem Dropkicks.
Brief description: Scott Parker, one-half of 3.0 with Shane Matthews, was a comedic yet skilled tag team performer in CHIKARA. Known for their humor and cohesive teamwork, 3.0 became a staple of the promotion’s tag division, often competing in King of Trios and other tournaments.

Scott Steiner
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with suplex-heavy offense.
Signature moves: Steiner Recliner, Frankensteiner, Belly-to-Belly Suplex.
Brief description: Scott Steiner, a legendary powerhouse in wrestling, appeared in CHIKARA during the 2012 King of Trios tournament as part of Team WWF. His star power and intense persona brought nostalgia and excitement to the event, where his signature suplexes and larger-than-life presence delighted fans.

Sea Donsters (Hydra & Tim Donst)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2008 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Aqua Lock (submission), Double Suplex, Comedy Grapples.
Brief description: The Sea Donsters were a comedic yet effective tag team that combined Hydra’s aquatic-themed antics with Tim Donst’s technical skills. Their humor and teamwork made them a popular act in CHIKARA’s tag division during their run.

Sean South
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Cloverleaf, Lariat, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Representing Team Ireland, Sean South competed in CHIKARA’s 2011 King of Trios tournament. His rugged, no-nonsense style and Irish patriotism added an international flavor to the event, complementing his team’s hard-hitting performances.

Sean Waltman
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: X-Factor (sit-out facebuster), Bronco Buster, Spinning Heel Kick.
Brief description: Sean Waltman, known for his time as X-Pac in WWE, competed in CHIKARA during the 2011 and 2012 King of Trios tournaments. His performances brought nostalgia and star power to the events, where his agility and iconic moves were on full display.

Sendai Sachiko
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Joshi puroresu with high-flying and technical elements.
Signature moves: Double Stomp, German Suplex, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Sendai Sachiko, representing Japanese women’s wrestling, competed in CHIKARA’s 2012 King of Trios tournament alongside Meiko Satomura and DASH Chisako. Her quickness and precision added an international flair to the tournament, showcasing the best of joshi puroresu.

Sexxxy Eddy
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2006 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Top Rope Moonsault, Sexxxy Splash, Rolling Suplex.
Brief description: Sexxxy Eddy was a flamboyant and comedic performer who brought humor and charisma to CHIKARA. Known for his over-the-top persona, Eddy was a fan favorite in the mid-2000s, often competing in multi-man matches and adding levity to the roster.

Shadow Phoenix
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with a dark persona.
Signature moves: Phoenix Splash, Superkick, Spinning Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Shadow Phoenix was a mysterious masked wrestler whose high-flying moves and dark demeanor captivated CHIKARA fans. His agility and innovative offense made him a standout in tournaments like Tag World Grand Prix.

Shane Hollister
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Buzzsaw Kick, Frog Splash, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Shane Hollister competed in CHIKARA during the early 2010s, bringing his striking ability and quickness to multi-man matches and tournaments. His sharp in-ring skills and dynamic offense made him a solid addition to CHIKARA’s roster.

Shane Matthews
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2017 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Sweet Taste of Professionalism (Double Flapjack), Assisted Suplex, Tandem Dropkicks.
Brief description: Shane Matthews, one-half of 3.0 with Scott Parker, was a key figure in CHIKARA’s tag team division. Known for their humor and teamwork, 3.0 became fan favorites and participated in numerous King of Trios tournaments and Campeonatos de Parejas title matches.

Shane Storm
Time in CHIKARA: 2004-2010 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: That Japanese Move (Shiranui), Air Raid Crash, Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: Shane Storm, a masked wrestler with a lighthearted persona, was a staple of CHIKARA’s early years. As part of the tag team Men at Work with Mr. ZERO, and later in a feud with UltraMantis Black, he became a beloved underdog in CHIKARA’s evolving roster.

Shane Strickland
Time in CHIKARA: 2013 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking with technical elements.
Signature moves: Swerve Stomp (Double Foot Stomp), 450 Splash, House Call (Jumping Kick).
Brief description: Shane Strickland, now known as Swerve Strickland, made a brief appearance in CHIKARA, showcasing his quickness and innovative offense. Though his time in the promotion was short, his athleticism stood out in the matches he competed in.

ShaneSaw (Shane Matthews & Jigsaw)
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying and comedic elements.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex, Assisted Moonsault, Dropkick Variations.
Brief description: ShaneSaw was a unique tag team pairing of Shane Matthews and Jigsaw, blending Matthews’ humor with Jigsaw’s technical expertise. Their limited run as a team showcased strong chemistry and entertaining performances in the tag division.

Shard
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2014 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and power-based elements.
Signature moves: Shardlock (Crossface), German Suplex, Superkick.
Brief description: Shard was a key member of GEKIDO, a faction that served as antagonists to CHIKARA’s heroes. Known for his intense demeanor and technical proficiency, Shard participated in faction-based rivalries and trios tournaments, leaving a lasting impact during his time in the promotion.

Shark Girl
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Shark Bite (corner splash), Diving Crossbody, Arm Drag.
Brief description: Shark Girl was a comedic, shark-themed character who competed in CHIKARA’s intergender and multi-person matches. Her humor and lighthearted approach made her a fun addition to CHIKARA’s whimsical roster during her brief appearances.

Shayne Hawke
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2011 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Tomahawke (Double Underhook Piledriver), Moonsault, European Uppercut.
Brief description: Shayne Hawke, a flamboyant and charismatic wrestler from Canada, was a consistent presence in CHIKARA. Known for his humorous promos and technical wrestling skills, he was a member of The Fabulous Two and participated in numerous tournaments and faction-based storylines.

Shazza McKenzie
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Shazztastic Stunner (Springboard Cutter), Bridging German Suplex, Roundhouse Kick.
Brief description: Shazza McKenzie, an Australian wrestler, brought her fiery personality and in-ring versatility to CHIKARA during her appearances. Competing in singles and intergender matches, she added an international flair to CHIKARA’s later years.

Shenron
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Dragon Star Press (Corkscrew 450 Splash), Tornado DDT, Springboard Hurricanrana.
Brief description: Shenron, a masked high-flyer, was one of CHIKARA’s most dynamic and exciting competitors. Known for his gravity-defying moves and incredible agility, he captured the Young Lions Cup and became a standout performer in the singles division.

Shiima Xion
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Filipino Destroyer (Front Flip Piledriver), Springboard Crossbody, Superkick.
Brief description: Shiima Xion, later known as Zema Ion in Impact Wrestling, brought his flashy offense and charisma to CHIKARA during his brief stint. His high-energy performances made him a memorable addition to multi-man matches.

SHINGO
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Made in Japan (Pumphandle Half-Nelson Driver), Lariat, Death Valley Bomb.
Brief description: SHINGO, representing Dragon Gate, competed in the 2007 King of Trios tournament. His hard-hitting style and imposing presence made him a standout in the event, showcasing the power and precision of Dragon Gate talent.

Shinjitsu Nohashi
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Bridging German Suplex, Diving Crossbody, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Shinjitsu Nohashi participated in CHIKARA’s 2012 King of Trios tournament, representing Japanese wrestling with agility and skill. His performances added a global dynamic to the event, impressing fans with his precision and technique.

Shinobu
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Moonsault Press, Knee Strike, Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: Shinobu, a Japanese wrestler known for his agility and explosive offense, competed in CHIKARA’s 2008 King of Trios tournament. His dynamic performances highlighted his international appeal and fit perfectly with CHIKARA’s diverse roster.

Shoko Nakajima
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Diving Senton, Tornado DDT, Northern Lights Suplex.
Brief description: Shoko Nakajima, representing Tokyo Joshi Pro Wrestling, brought her whimsical "Kaiju" persona to CHIKARA during the 2019 King of Trios tournament. Her combination of charisma, humor, and skilled in-ring work made her a fan favorite in the event.

Shynron
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Dragon Star Press (Corkscrew 450 Splash), Springboard Hurricanrana, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Shynron, also known as the "Spirit Dragon," was a high-energy performer known for his incredible aerial maneuvers. A former Young Lions Cup Champion, he was a standout competitor in CHIKARA’s singles division, thrilling audiences with his innovative and high-risk style.

Silas Young
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Misery (Fireman’s Carry Cutter), Lariat, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Silas Young, "The Last Real Man," competed in CHIKARA during its early years, showcasing his no-nonsense style and strong technical skills. Though his time in the promotion was brief, he delivered solid performances in singles and multi-person matches.

Silver Ant
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2018 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios, and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Ant Hill (Piledriver), Cloverleaf, Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: Silver Ant, a member of The Colony, was one of CHIKARA’s most technically proficient wrestlers. Known for his crisp execution and ability to adapt to various match types, he played a crucial role in The Colony’s trios success, including victories in the King of Trios tournaments.

Sicodelico Jr.
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with power-based elements.
Signature moves: Top Rope Plancha, Rolling Senton, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Sicodelico Jr., representing lucha libre tradition, competed in the 2008 King of Trios tournament. His combination of size, strength, and lucha-inspired techniques added international variety to the event.

Simon Grimm
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Catch wrestling and striking.
Signature moves: Wristlock Suplex, European Uppercut, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Simon Grimm, formerly known as Simon Gotch in WWE, brought his classic grappling style and technical prowess to CHIKARA. His performances highlighted his skill and adaptability, fitting seamlessly into the promotion's diverse roster.

Sinn Bodhi
Time in CHIKARA: 2014 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with character-driven antics.
Signature moves: Telltale Heart (Jumping Neckbreaker), Corner Splash, Chokeslam.
Brief description: Sinn Bodhi, a dark and eccentric performer, competed in CHIKARA’s 2014 King of Trios tournament as part of a unique and bizarre team. His theatrical style and unconventional persona made him a standout during his appearance.

Skayde
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2010 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor and trainer.
Wrestling style: Traditional lucha libre.
Signature moves: Armbar Variations, Tilt-a-Whirl Backbreaker, Moonsault Press.
Brief description: Skayde was instrumental in CHIKARA's early years, serving as a key trainer at the Wrestle Factory and competing in matches that displayed his mastery of lucha libre. His influence is seen in the development of CHIKARA’s lucha-inspired roster.

Sloan Caprice
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Caprice Clutch (modified Boston Crab), Powerslam, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Sloan Caprice was a strong and determined competitor in CHIKARA, contributing to the promotion's roster during its revival period. While not a major figure, his solid performances added depth to the card.

Slyk Wagner Brown
Time in CHIKARA: 2005 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with aerial elements.
Signature moves: Asai Moonsault, Lariat, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Slyk Wagner Brown competed in CHIKARA during the mid-2000s, bringing his athleticism and charisma to the promotion. Known for his blend of power and agility, he participated in singles and multi-man matches.

Smash
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Smash Factor (Powerbomb), Suplex Variations, Big Boot.
Brief description: Smash, a member of Demolition, appeared in CHIKARA’s 2012 King of Trios tournament as part of Team WWF. His appearance brought nostalgia and excitement to fans, contributing to the event's blend of wrestling styles and eras.

Snowflake
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical with power-based elements.
Signature moves: Cold Snap (Backbreaker), Suplex Variations, Running Lariat.
Brief description: Snowflake was a member of The BDK (Bruderschaft des Kreuzes), a villainous faction in CHIKARA. His stoic persona and strength-based offense made him a reliable enforcer for the faction, contributing to their dominance during this period.

Solar
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional lucha libre.
Signature moves: Solar Stretch (submission hold), Tilt-a-Whirl Backbreaker, Flying Armdrag.
Brief description: Solar, a legendary luchador, participated in CHIKARA’s 2007 and 2008 King of Trios tournaments. Known for his mastery of classic lucha libre, he brought authenticity and excitement to CHIKARA’s events, captivating fans with his timeless skills.

Soldier Ant
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2018 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Saluting Headbutt, TKO (Fireman’s Carry Cutter), Cloverleaf.
Brief description: Soldier Ant, a key member of The Colony, was a disciplined and heroic figure in CHIKARA’s trios division. Known for his military-inspired persona and strong teamwork, he contributed to The Colony’s success, including victories in King of Trios tournaments.

Solo Darling
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of technical and high-flying with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Sugar Rush (Snapmare Driver), Cloverleaf, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Solo Darling, known for her sweet yet tenacious persona, was a beloved figure in CHIKARA. A member of The Rumblebees and later The Furies, her strong in-ring skills and engaging character made her a fan favorite, as she competed in tag team and factional rivalries.

Sonjay Dutt
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Hindu Press (Springsault Moonsault), Tornado DDT, Standing Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Sonjay Dutt brought his quick-paced and high-flying style to CHIKARA during the 2006 Tag World Grand Prix. Known for his athleticism and international acclaim, he delivered exciting performances during his appearances.

Sonny Defarge
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Defarge Driver (Pumphandle Slam), Suplex Variations, Lariat.
Brief description: Sonny Defarge, often teaming with Cornelius Crummels, formed a cunning and scheming duo. Known for their old-school villainous tactics, the pair were consistent competitors in CHIKARA’s tag division, participating in feuds and faction-based storylines.

Sons of Ulaid (Damian Corvin & Bonesaw)
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2018 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex, Corner Strikes, Powerbomb Variations.
Brief description: Sons of Ulaid, an Irish tag team, brought their physical style to CHIKARA during King of Trios tournaments. Known for their grit and intensity, they represented a strong international presence in the promotion.

Space Monkey
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Banana Peel Moonsault, Monkey Flip, Tail Whip (spinning strike).
Brief description: Space Monkey, a primate astronaut-themed wrestler, was a fan-favorite due to his quirky character and creative in-ring style. His unique gimmick and entertaining antics made him a standout during his appearances in CHIKARA’s tournaments and multi-man matches.

Spectral Envoy (Hallowicked, UltraMantis Black, Frightmare)
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Dark, technical, and striking-based.
Signature moves: Cosmic Doom (group finisher), Graveyard Smash (double team), Individual Finishers.
Brief description: The Spectral Envoy was a supernatural-themed faction led by UltraMantis Black, with Hallowicked and Frightmare as key members. Their eerie personas and in-ring excellence made them dominant players in CHIKARA, including a victory in the 2012 King of Trios tournament.

Spirit Squad
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitors.
Wrestling style: Comedy and teamwork-based wrestling.
Signature moves: Cheerleader Pyramid (team-assisted splash), Tandem Suplex, Double Dropkick.
Brief description: The Spirit Squad, a group of male cheerleaders known for their WWE run, competed in CHIKARA’s 2016 King of Trios tournament. Their comedic antics and synchronized teamwork entertained fans and added a nostalgic element to the event.

Spoiler
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Lower card, comedic competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Spoiler Bomb (Powerbomb), Corner Splash, Claw Hold.
Brief description: The Spoiler, a parody of classic wrestling villains, brought humor to CHIKARA during his limited appearances. With his exaggerated tactics and over-the-top personality, he added a lighthearted touch to multi-man matches.

Spyrazul
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Spinning Headscissors, Diving Crossbody, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Spyrazul, a masked luchador, appeared in CHIKARA during the 2008 King of Trios tournament. Known for his mysterious persona and quick movements, he provided an international flair to the roster during his brief stint.

Steve Corino
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Old School Expulsion (Rolling Cutter), Superkick, Northern Lights Suplex.
Brief description: Steve Corino, a seasoned veteran, brought his old-school style and experience to CHIKARA during the 2007 Tag World Grand Prix. His storytelling ability and technical prowess added depth to the event and elevated the matches he participated in.

STIGMA
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2013 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Stigmata (Cobra Clutch Slam), Running Knee Strike, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: STIGMA, formerly known as Shane Storm, transitioned into a darker, more aggressive persona after unmasking. A loyal member of the CHIKARA roster, he participated in many notable feuds and tag team matches, showcasing his versatility and commitment to the promotion’s storytelling.

Still Life With Apricots And Pears
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and character-driven.
Signature moves: Apricot Jam (Running Knee), Bridging German Suplex, Arm Drag Variations.
Brief description: Still Life With Apricots And Pears was an avant-garde character brought to life with an artistic and surreal gimmick. Their matches often blended technical proficiency with unique storytelling, making them a standout in CHIKARA’s later years as part of Nouveau Aesthetic.

Stinky The Homeless Guy
Time in CHIKARA: 2005 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with comedic antics.
Signature moves: Trash Can Smash, Sleeper Hold, Big Splash.
Brief description: Stinky The Homeless Guy was a comedic character who competed in CHIKARA’s early events. Known for his humorous gimmick and outlandish persona, he brought levity to the promotion’s burgeoning roster during its formative years.

Stokely Hathaway
Time in CHIKARA: 2013 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Manager.
Wrestling style: Managerial interference and character-driven promos.
Signature moves: N/A (Manager).
Brief description: Stokely Hathaway, known for his charismatic promos and managerial antics, briefly appeared in CHIKARA as part of various storylines. His wit and presence enhanced the personalities of the wrestlers he represented, contributing to their character development.

Stupefied (Player Dos)
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2012, 2018-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Frog Splash, Tornado DDT, Superkick.
Brief description: Stupefied, later known as Player Dos of The Super Smash Brothers, was a staple of CHIKARA’s tag division. His incredible agility and creative moves, often alongside Player Uno, made him a fan favorite and a key player in CHIKARA’s trios tournaments.

Submission Squad
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2015 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, tag team and trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic.
Signature moves: Cloverleaf, Cross Armbreaker, Double Submission Holds.
Brief description: The Submission Squad, a team of quirky and technically proficient wrestlers, brought a mix of humor and grappling to CHIKARA. They were frequent participants in multi-man matches and tournaments, often playing the role of entertaining underdogs.

Sugar Dunkerton
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical elements.
Signature moves: Alley-Oop (Swinging Facebuster), Dunk You Very Much (Jumping Elbow), Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Sugar Dunkerton, a basketball-themed wrestler, was beloved for his humor and charisma. As a member of The Throwbacks with Dasher Hatfield, he participated in King of Trios tournaments and memorable tag team feuds, earning his place as a standout character in CHIKARA.

Sumie Sakai
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Missile Dropkick, German Suplex, Armbar.
Brief description: Sumie Sakai, a veteran of Japanese wrestling, brought her experience and precision to CHIKARA during the 2006 Tag World Grand Prix. Her appearances highlighted the promotion’s commitment to showcasing international talent.

Super Beetle
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Bug Bomb (Diving Splash), Springboard Armdrag, Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: Super Beetle, a masked wrestler with an insect-themed gimmick, entertained fans with his whimsical persona and lighthearted matches. He was a fun addition to CHIKARA’s colorful roster during his brief appearances.

Super Dragon
Time in CHIKARA: 2005 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Psycho Driver (Spinning Driver), Double Stomp, Curb Stomp.
Brief description: Super Dragon, a renowned independent wrestler, participated in CHIKARA’s 2005 Tag World Grand Prix. Known for his intense and unrelenting style, he added a level of danger and excitement to the tournament.

uper Smash Brothers (Player Uno & Stupefied/Player Dos)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2012, 2018-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, tag team and trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Fatality (Assisted Backbreaker into Driver), Double Superkick, Tandem Suplexes.
Brief description: The Super Smash Brothers, a Canadian duo, became one of CHIKARA’s most beloved tag teams. Combining creative double-team maneuvers, high-energy offense, and humor, they were regulars in tournaments like King of Trios and Tag World Grand Prix. Their dynamic teamwork and unique characters left a lasting impact on the promotion.

Swamp Monster
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2014 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with comedic antics.
Signature moves: Swamp Slam (Powerslam), Splash Attack, Chokehold.
Brief description: Swamp Monster, a bizarre creature from the swamp, was a humorous addition to CHIKARA’s roster. Often seen as a background character or in comedic matches, the Swamp Monster’s antics provided levity and entertainment for fans during their appearances.

Sylverhawk
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Silver Slam (Powerslam), Diving Crossbody, Headscissors Takedown.
Brief description: Sylverhawk was a member of The Cyberhawks 2000, a futuristic-themed trio. Known for his athleticism and agility, he frequently competed in trios tournaments and multi-man matches, contributing to The Cyberhawks’ exciting and fast-paced in-ring style.

Tadasuke
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Lariat, Brainbuster, Death Valley Bomb.
Brief description: Tadasuke, representing Osaka Pro Wrestling, competed in the 2011 King of Trios tournament. His intense and hard-hitting style made him a standout in the event, showcasing the strength and talent of international wrestlers.

Takashi Sasaki
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and hardcore.
Signature moves: D-Geist (Fisherman Buster), Death Valley Driver, Superkick.
Brief description: Takashi Sasaki, a Japanese wrestler known for his hardcore background, participated in the 2011 King of Trios tournament. His appearances highlighted his striking ability and added a gritty dynamic to the event’s international lineup.

Tank Toland
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Military Press Slam, Spinebuster, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Tank Toland, a muscle-bound competitor with a comedic edge, brought his strength and humor to CHIKARA during his appearances. His performances combined athleticism with character-driven entertainment.

Tatanka
Time in CHIKARA: 2015 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking elements.
Signature moves: Tomahawk Chop, End of the Trail (Samoan Drop), Running Powerslam.
Brief description: WWE legend Tatanka competed in CHIKARA’s 2015 King of Trios tournament as part of Team WWF. His presence brought nostalgia and excitement to the event, as he showcased his signature offense and enduring charisma.

Team AAA (Rey Bucanero, Drago, Fénix)
Time in CHIKARA: 2015 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with high-flying and technical elements.
Signature moves: Triple Dive Sequence, Springboard Hurricanrana, Assisted Splash.
Brief description: Team AAA represented Mexican lucha libre in the 2015 King of Trios tournament. Featuring high-profile stars like Drago and Fénix, their thrilling aerial moves and dynamic teamwork made them one of the standout teams of the event.

Team AnDrew (Andy Ridge & Drew Gulak)
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex, Rolling Elbow, Submission Holds.
Brief description: Team AnDrew, composed of Drew Gulak and Andy Ridge, participated in CHIKARA’s 2011 King of Trios tournament. Their strong technical wrestling and chemistry added depth to the event, even though they were primarily a guest team.

Team ATTACK! (Mark Andrews, Pete Dunne & Eddie Dennis)
Time in CHIKARA: 2017 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Assisted Shooting Star Press, Double Suplex, Corner Strikes.
Brief description: Representing the UK promotion ATTACK! Pro Wrestling, this trio brought a mix of agility, power, and technical prowess to CHIKARA’s 2017 King of Trios. Their performances highlighted the global nature of the tournament and the UK wrestling scene’s talent.

Team Australia (Adam Brooks, Mick Moretti & Jack Bonza)
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting with high-flying and technical elements.
Signature moves: Triple Suplex, Assisted Powerbomb, Striking Combinations.
Brief description: Team Australia represented their country in CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments, showcasing their unique blend of styles. Mick Moretti’s eccentricity, Jack Bonza’s power, and Adam Brooks’ agility made them a standout team.

Team Beyond (Chris Dickinson, Drew Gulak & Jaka)
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical.
Signature moves: Triple Strike Combination, German Suplex Variations, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Representing Beyond Wrestling, Team Beyond competed in the 2016 King of Trios tournament. Their strong chemistry and physical style earned them recognition as a cohesive and dangerous trio.

Team Big Japan Wrestling (Daisuke Sekimoto, Yuji Okabayashi & Yoshihito Sasaki)
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Triple Lariat, Powerbomb Variations, Bridging Suplexes.
Brief description: Representing Big Japan Pro Wrestling, this powerhouse trio brought an explosive, hard-hitting style to the 2011 King of Trios. Their dominance and physicality made them one of the most formidable teams in the tournament.

Team CHIKARA (Hallowicked, UltraMantis Black & Frightmare)
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with supernatural elements.
Signature moves: Cosmic Doom (team finisher), Death Valley Driver, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Representing CHIKARA in the 2012 King of Trios tournament, this team of The Spectral Envoy captured the tournament victory. Their combination of eerie personas and exceptional in-ring ability cemented their legacy in the promotion.

Team CZW (Eddie Kingston, Joker & Sabian)
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Hardcore with striking and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Tandem Lariats, Frog Splash, Superkick.
Brief description: Representing Combat Zone Wrestling, Team CZW competed in the 2008 King of Trios tournament. Their gritty, hard-hitting style contrasted with CHIKARA’s lighter atmosphere, making their performances memorable.

Team DDT (KUDO, Kota Ibushi & Michael Nakazawa)
Time in CHIKARA: 2009 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and comedic with striking elements.
Signature moves: Triple Team Strikes, Ibushi’s Golden Star Press, KUDO’s Double Stomp.
Brief description: Representing Japan’s DDT Pro-Wrestling, this team brought a mix of incredible athleticism and humor to CHIKARA’s 2009 King of Trios tournament. Their blend of Kota Ibushi’s aerial mastery and Michael Nakazawa’s comedic antics made them a crowd favorite.

Team Delicioso (Curry Man, El Generico & Chiva II)
Time in CHIKARA: 2009 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Spicy Drop (Curry Man), Brainbustaaaaa! (Generico), and Flying Arm Drags (Chiva II).
Brief description: Team Delicioso brought flavor and fun to the 2009 King of Trios tournament. With Curry Man’s flamboyant personality, El Generico’s high-flying excellence, and Chiva II’s lucha flair, they were one of the most entertaining teams in the tournament.

Team Dragon Gate (CIMA, Masato Yoshino & Naruki Doi)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2009 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-speed, high-flying, and technical.
Signature moves: Triple Team Strikes, Torbellino (Yoshino), Schwein (CIMA).
Brief description: Representing Japan’s Dragon Gate promotion, Team Dragon Gate showcased world-class talent in CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments. Their fast-paced, innovative style made them one of the most exciting teams in the history of the event.

Team DragonDoor (Yoshitsune, Kota Ibushi & Kagetora)
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Double Moonsault (Yoshitsune), Golden Star Press (Ibushi), Kagetora’s Striking Combinations.
Brief description: Representing the short-lived DragonDoor promotion, this team competed in the 2006 Tag World Grand Prix. Their aerial artistry and fast-paced style thrilled CHIKARA audiences, emphasizing the global reach of the event.

Team El Dorado (KUDO, Toru Owashi & Michael Nakazawa)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic and striking elements.
Signature moves: Owashi’s Powerbomb, KUDO’s Diving Double Stomp, Nakazawa’s Antics.
Brief description: Representing El Dorado Wrestling, this team brought an entertaining mix of power, precision, and comedy to the 2007 King of Trios. Their chemistry and diverse in-ring styles made them a fun addition to the tournament.

Team EPIC WAR (Scorpio Sky, Joey Ryan & Karl Anderson)
Time in CHIKARA: 2009 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Spinebuster (Anderson), Superkick (Ryan).
Brief description: Representing the Southern California-based EPIC WAR promotion, this team competed in the 2009 King of Trios. Their blend of charisma and solid wrestling ability added variety to the event’s roster.

Team Equinox (Equinox, Lince Dorado & Helios)
Time in CHIKARA: 2009 (regular appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Double Moonsault (Lince), Helios’ 630 Splash, Equinox’s Bridging Suplex.
Brief description: A high-energy trio, Team Equinox featured three of CHIKARA’s most exciting young stars. They competed in the 2009 King of Trios, thrilling audiences with their innovative aerial offense and synchronized teamwork.

Team Fight Club: PRO (Trent Seven, Tyler Bate & Dan Moloney)
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with power-based elements.
Signature moves: Tyler Driver ’97 (Bate), Seven Star Lariat (Seven), Triple Strikes.
Brief description: Representing the UK-based Fight Club: PRO promotion, this team competed in the 2016 King of Trios tournament. Their blend of hard-hitting strikes and power moves impressed fans and showcased the best of British wrestling.

Team FIST (Chuck Taylor, Icarus & Gran Akuma)
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2011 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and comedic elements.
Signature moves: FIST Kick (triple kick), Sole Food (Taylor), Shiranui (Icarus).
Brief description: Team FIST (Friends in Similar Tights) was a dominant faction in CHIKARA’s history. Known for their cocky attitudes and cohesive teamwork, they were fixtures in King of Trios and other major events, cementing themselves as top villains in the promotion.

Team Frightning (Frightmare, Lightning Mike Quackenbush & Jigsaw)
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (regular appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Quackendriver III (Quackenbush), Brainbuster (Jigsaw), Kneecolepsy (Frightmare).
Brief description: This eclectic team of CHIKARA regulars combined their unique skills to compete in the 2010 King of Trios tournament. Their mix of experience and energy made them a strong contender in the event.

Team IWA Mid-South (Chuck Taylor, Ricochet & Claudio Castagnoli)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with power-based elements.
Signature moves: Ricochet’s 630 Splash, Claudio’s Ricola Bomb, Taylor’s Sole Food.
Brief description: Representing IWA Mid-South, this team was a standout in the 2007 King of Trios tournament. Their diverse skill set and established chemistry made them one of the most exciting teams in the competition.

Team IWS (Player Uno, Stupefied & El Generico)
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and comedic with technical elements.
Signature moves: Fatality (Player Uno & Stupefied), Brainbustaaaaa! (Generico).
Brief description: Representing Montreal’s International Wrestling Syndicate, this team competed in the 2008 King of Trios tournament. Their combination of comedy, athleticism, and charisma delighted CHIKARA audiences.

Team Janelope (Joey Janela & Penelope Ford)
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking with character-driven elements.
Signature moves: Assisted Stunner, Double Superkick, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Joey Janela and Penelope Ford brought their eccentric chemistry to CHIKARA, competing as a duo in multi-person matches. Their dynamic style and engaging characters made them a strong addition to CHIKARA’s roster.

Team JWP (Command Bolshoi, Hanako Nakamori & Kaori Yoneyama)
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Joshi puroresu with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Triple Suplex, Command Bolshoi’s Cross Armbreaker, Nakamori’s Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Representing Japan’s JWP Joshi Puroresu promotion, this team brought a mix of hard-hitting strikes and precise techniques to the 2012 King of Trios tournament, highlighting the strength and skill of joshi wrestling.

Team K-DOJO (MIYAWAKI, Yoshiaki Yago & KUDO)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2009 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Strong-style with high-flying and technical elements.
Signature moves: Triple Team Strikes, Bridging Suplexes, Diving Knee Drop (KUDO).
Brief description: Representing Kaientai Dojo, this team participated in multiple King of Trios tournaments. Their combination of power, precision, and high-flying techniques showcased the versatility of Japanese wrestling talent.

Team Kingston (Eddie Kingston, Sabian & Joker)
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (regular appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Brawling with striking and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Triple Lariat, Frog Splash (Sabian), Backfist to the Future (Kingston).
Brief description: This team was led by Eddie Kingston and represented his gritty, no-nonsense approach. Their participation in the 2008 King of Trios added an element of physicality and intensity to the tournament.

Team Michinoku Pro (Great Sasuke, Jinsei Shinzaki & Dick Togo)
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Triple Team Strikes, Diving Senton (Sasuke), Praying Powerbomb (Shinzaki).
Brief description: Representing the legendary Michinoku Pro promotion, this team of pioneers competed in the 2011 King of Trios tournament. Their storied careers and iconic moves made them one of the most anticipated teams in the event, drawing widespread acclaim.

Team Minnesota (Arik Cannon, Darin Corbin & Ryan Cruz)
Time in CHIKARA: 2009 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Brawling and high-flying with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Assisted Senton, Tandem Suplex, Corner Strikes.
Brief description: Representing the Minnesota wrestling scene, this team showcased a mix of humor, teamwork, and grit in the 2009 King of Trios tournament. They brought a unique regional flavor to the competition.

Team MPW (Kenny Omega, Chuck Taylor & 2.0)
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and comedic.
Signature moves: Omega’s One-Winged Angel, Taylor’s Sole Food, Double Team Suplex (2.0).
Brief description: Representing Manitoba Pro Wrestling, this team combined Omega’s dynamic offense with Taylor and 2.0’s humor and tag team chemistry, creating a memorable and entertaining presence in the 2008 King of Trios tournament.

Team Muga (Osamu Nishimura, Mitsuo Momota & Daisuke Ikeda)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Traditional Japanese technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Bridging Suplexes, Sleeper Holds, Ground Submissions.
Brief description: Representing the traditional Japanese style of Muga wrestling, this team brought a slower, more methodical approach to the 2007 King of Trios. Their appearances highlighted the diversity of wrestling styles in CHIKARA’s tournaments.

Team Original Divas Revolution (Jazz, Victoria & Mickie James)
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Power-based and technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Widow’s Peak (Victoria), DDT (Mickie), Fisherman Buster (Jazz).
Brief description: This team of iconic female wrestlers competed in the 2016 King of Trios tournament, representing women’s wrestling from WWE’s early 2000s era. Their star power and veteran skills made them one of the standout teams in the event.

Team Osaka Pro (Atsushi Kotoge, Daisuke Harada & Ultimate Spider Jr.)
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired with technical elements.
Signature moves: Triple Team Suplex, Diving Crossbody, Spider Driver.
Brief description: Representing Osaka Pro Wrestling, this team participated in the 2011 King of Trios tournament. Their quickness and teamwork captivated audiences, showcasing the unique talents of Osaka Pro wrestlers.

Team Perros del Mal (Perro Aguayo Jr., Halloween & Damien 666)
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Brawling with lucha libre elements.
Signature moves: Triple Lariat, Chair Shots, Diving Senton.
Brief description: Representing the Mexican promotion Perros del Mal, this team competed in the 2012 King of Trios tournament. Known for their rough-and-tumble style, they brought a chaotic energy to the event.

Team Police Squad (Officer Warren Barksdale, Super Cop Dick Justice & Deputy Dan)
Time in CHIKARA: 2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Comedy with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Cuff Lock (Sleeper Hold), Double Axe Handle, Corner Splash.
Brief description: A comedic trio of law enforcement-themed wrestlers, Team Police Squad brought humor and lightheartedness to CHIKARA’s trios matches. Their exaggerated characters made them a fan-favorite for comedic relief.

Team Pump (Big Poppa Pump Scott Steiner, Petey Williams & Jordan Grace)
Time in CHIKARA: 2018 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Steiner Recliner, Canadian Destroyer, Grace Driver.
Brief description: Representing the spirit of Scott Steiner’s “Big Poppa Pump” persona, this team combined raw power with innovative offense. Their participation in the 2018 King of Trios added star power and excitement to the tournament.

Team PWG (Super Dragon, Kevin Steen & El Generico)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and hard-hitting with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Package Piledriver (Steen), Brainbustaaaaa! (Generico), Psycho Driver (Super Dragon).
Brief description: Representing Pro Wrestling Guerrilla, this team was a highlight of the 2007 King of Trios. Their combination of athleticism, brutality, and humor made them one of the most popular teams in the tournament’s history.

Team ROH (Austin Aries, Roderick Strong & Delirious)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying and striking elements.
Signature moves: 450 Splash (Aries), Stronghold (Strong), Panic Attack (Delirious).
Brief description: Representing Ring of Honor, this team participated in the 2007 King of Trios tournament. Known for their technical mastery and intensity, they brought ROH’s signature wrestling style to CHIKARA, elevating the tournament’s level of competition.

Team Sea Stars (Ashley Vox & Delmi Exo)
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Tidal Wave (double team splash), Double Suplex, Assisted Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: The Sea Stars, a sister duo, brought their oceanic-themed gimmick and impressive tag team synergy to CHIKARA. They were a popular act in the women’s and intergender divisions, known for their teamwork and charisma.

Team Sendai Girls (Meiko Satomura, DASH Chisako & Sendai Sachiko)
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical joshi puroresu.
Signature moves: Scorpio Rising (Satomura), Diving Double Stomp (Chisako), German Suplex (Sachiko).
Brief description: Representing Sendai Girls’ Pro Wrestling, this team showcased the best of Japanese women’s wrestling during the 2012 King of Trios tournament. Their skill, precision, and striking ability made them one of the standout teams in the event.

Team SHIMMER (Sara Del Rey, Madison Eagles & Daizee Haze)
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Royal Butterfly (Del Rey), Hellbound (Eagles), Mind Trip (Haze).
Brief description: Representing SHIMMER Women Athletes, this trio of top women’s wrestlers competed in the 2011 King of Trios. Their impressive performances highlighted the growing prominence of women’s wrestling in CHIKARA and beyond.

Team Sweeney (Larry Sweeney, Mitch Ryder & Shayne Hawke)
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Comedy and technical wrestling with striking elements.
Signature moves: Sweet & Sour Elbow (Sweeney), Piledriver (Ryder), Tomahawke (Hawke).
Brief description: Led by the charismatic Larry Sweeney, this team combined humor and old-school wrestling sensibilities. Their antics and strong teamwork made them an entertaining part of the 2008 King of Trios tournament.

Team TNA (AJ Styles, Christopher Daniels & Chris Sabin)
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Styles Clash (Styles), BME (Daniels), Cradle Shock (Sabin).
Brief description: Representing TNA Wrestling, this team brought star power and jaw-dropping performances to the 2016 King of Trios. Their blend of athleticism and chemistry made them a highlight of the tournament.

Team Toryumon (CIMA, Dragon Kid & Susumu Yokosuka)
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Meteora (CIMA), Dragonrana (Dragon Kid), Jumbo no Kachi! (Yokosuka).
Brief description: Representing the legendary Toryumon promotion, this team competed in the 2008 King of Trios tournament. Their incredible aerial offense and technical expertise made them one of the standout teams in the event’s history.

Team Toryumon X (Kagetora, Akira Tozawa & Shingo Takagi)
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking with power-based elements.
Signature moves: Made in Japan (Takagi), Tozawa’s German Suplex, Kagetora’s Striking Combinations.
Brief description: Representing Toryumon X, this team was a powerhouse trio that left a lasting impression in the 2010 King of Trios. Their blend of speed, strength, and intensity made them one of the most dangerous teams in the tournament.

Team UK (Martin Stone, Zack Sabre Jr. & Johnny Moss)
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with power-based elements.
Signature moves: Sabre’s Armbar, Stone’s Suplex Variations, Moss’s Powerbomb.
Brief description: Representing the United Kingdom, this team showcased the technical precision and hard-hitting style of British wrestling. Their participation in the 2011 King of Trios highlighted the global diversity of the event.

Team Uppercut (Claudio Castagnoli, Bryan Danielson & Dave Taylor)
Time in CHIKARA: 2009 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: European-style technical and striking.
Signature moves: Castagnoli’s Ricola Bomb, Danielson’s Cattle Mutilation, Taylor’s European Uppercut.
Brief description: Team Uppercut brought together a dream team of European and technical wrestling masters. Their incredible chemistry and skill made them a highlight of the 2009 King of Trios tournament, earning widespread acclaim for their performances.

Team Vin Gerard (Vin Gerard, STIGMA & Colin Delaney)
Time in CHIKARA: 2009 (regular appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: STIGMA’s Stigmata (Cobra Clutch Slam), Gerard’s STF, Delaney’s Cutter.
Brief description: This team, led by Vin Gerard, represented a darker and more antagonistic side of CHIKARA. Their participation in the 2009 King of Trios showcased their faction’s combative chemistry and penchant for bending the rules.

Team World of Sport (Johnny Kidd, Mike Quackenbush & Colt Cabana)
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: British technical wrestling and comedic elements.
Signature moves: Kidd’s Bridging Roll-Up, Quackenbush’s Quackendriver, Cabana’s Flying Apple.
Brief description: Representing the classic British wrestling style, this team competed in the 2011 King of Trios tournament. Their matches were a mix of technical brilliance and lighthearted entertainment, paying homage to the World of Sport era.

Team Wrestle Factory (Quackenbush, Jigsaw & Equinox)
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2010 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Quackendriver III, Equinox’s Bridging German Suplex, Jigsaw’s Brainbuster.
Brief description: Representing the CHIKARA Wrestle Factory, this team of top trainees and mentors competed in King of Trios tournaments. Their mix of experience and youthful energy showcased the school’s legacy of producing world-class talent.

Team WWF (1-2-3 Kid, Tatanka & Yokozuna)
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: 1-2-3 Kid’s Moonsault, Tatanka’s Tomahawk Chop, Yokozuna’s Banzai Drop.
Brief description: Representing the golden era of WWE (formerly WWF), this nostalgic trio competed in the 2012 King of Trios. Their iconic personas and moves thrilled fans, bringing a sense of nostalgia and star power to the tournament.

Team WXW (Big Van Walter, Karsten Beck & Zack Sabre Jr.)
Time in CHIKARA: 2013 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting European style with technical elements.
Signature moves: Walter’s Big Boot, Beck’s Powerbomb, Sabre’s Armbar.
Brief description: Representing Germany’s Westside Xtreme Wrestling (WXW), this team showcased a mix of European power and technical finesse in the 2013 King of Trios tournament. Their strong performances highlighted WXW’s global reputation.

Tempura Boyz (Sho & Yoh)
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 3K (Assisted Flatliner), Double Suplex, Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: The Tempura Boyz, Sho and Yoh, brought their dynamic tag team style to CHIKARA during the 2016 King of Trios. Their crisp teamwork and agility made them a standout team in the tournament.

Thief Ant
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Flying Armdrag, Moonsault, Tilt-a-Whirl Headscissors.
Brief description: Thief Ant, a masked member of The Crucible, was part of CHIKARA’s evolving Colony lore. With a mix of agility and character-driven storytelling, Thief Ant added intrigue and excitement to the promotion’s roster.

Thomas Dubois
Time in CHIKARA: 2013 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Big Boot, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Thomas Dubois, one-half of TDT (Tabarnak de Team) with Mathieu St-Jacques, brought his physical, no-nonsense style to CHIKARA. The duo competed in the 2013 King of Trios tournament, showcasing strong teamwork and raw power.

Thomas Santell
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with submission elements.
Signature moves: Sugar Hold (submission), Northern Lights Suplex, Bridging Roll-Up.
Brief description: Thomas Santell, a throwback to old-school technical wrestling, appeared in CHIKARA with a clean-cut, retro persona. His matches highlighted his grappling expertise and ability to captivate audiences with his unique character.

Thomasellis (Sal, Vito, & Brandon Thomaselli)
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical and power elements.
Signature moves: Triple Suplex, Diving Headbutt, Powerbomb Variations.
Brief description: The Thomasellis, a family trio, competed in CHIKARA’s 2006 Tag World Grand Prix. Known for their hard-hitting style and cohesive teamwork, they added a rugged dynamic to CHIKARA’s tag team scene.

Throwbacks (Dasher Hatfield & Sugar Dunkerton)
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of comedy, technical, and high-flying wrestling.
Signature moves: Grand Slam (double-team finisher), Baseball Slide, Alley-Oop (Swinging Facebuster).
Brief description: The Throwbacks were a beloved tag team combining Dasher Hatfield’s baseball-inspired persona with Sugar Dunkerton’s basketball-themed antics. Their entertaining blend of humor and skill made them fan favorites in CHIKARA’s tag team division and trios tournaments.

ThunderKitty
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Old-school grappling and brawling.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Flying Crossbody, Bodyslam.
Brief description: ThunderKitty’s vintage wrestling persona brought a nostalgic charm to CHIKARA. Her matches were rooted in classic techniques, creating a unique contrast to the promotion’s modern and dynamic roster.

Tim Donst
Time in CHIKARA: 2007-2014 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based with striking elements.
Signature moves: Donstitution (Gory Bomb), From Dusk ‘Til Donst (STF), Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Tim Donst was one of CHIKARA’s most prominent wrestlers, transitioning from a comedic rookie to a dark, intense competitor. He captured the Young Lions Cup and participated in numerous storylines and feuds, solidifying himself as a key figure in CHIKARA’s history.

Tito Santana
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Traditional and technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Flying Forearm Smash, Figure Four Leglock, Sunset Flip.
Brief description: WWE legend Tito Santana competed in CHIKARA’s 2012 King of Trios tournament as part of Team WWF. His timeless charisma and classic wrestling style brought nostalgia and excitement to the event, making him a crowd favorite.

To Infinity And Beyond (Cheech & Colin Delaney)
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Assisted Tornado DDT, Double Moonsault, Tandem Suplexes.
Brief description: To Infinity And Beyond was a skilled and cohesive tag team that competed in CHIKARA’s tag tournaments and events. Their chemistry and innovative double-team maneuvers made them a strong addition to CHIKARA’s tag division.

Tommaso Ciampa
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and power-based.
Signature moves: Project Ciampa (Powerbomb to Knees), Running Knee Strike, Air Raid Crash.
Brief description: Tommaso Ciampa appeared in CHIKARA during the early 2010s, showcasing his intense, hard-hitting style. Though his time in the promotion was brief, he left a strong impression in his matches, contributing to CHIKARA’s singles roster.

Tommy Dreamer
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling.
Signature moves: Dreamer Driver (Death Valley Driver), DDT, Spicoli Driver.
Brief description: The hardcore legend Tommy Dreamer brought his extreme style to CHIKARA during the 2016 King of Trios tournament. Representing his ECW roots, Dreamer provided fans with a nostalgic yet physical performance.

Tommy End (Malakai Black)
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and submission-based.
Signature moves: Black Mass (Spinning Heel Kick), Owari Death Clutch (Submission), Moonsault Press.
Brief description: Tommy End competed in CHIKARA’s tournaments and events, showcasing his striking-heavy offense and eerie persona. As a competitor with an enigmatic presence, he left a memorable mark on CHIKARA’s later years.

Tommaso Ciampa
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and power-based.
Signature moves: Project Ciampa (Powerbomb to Knees), Running Knee Strike, Air Raid Crash.
Brief description: Tommaso Ciampa showcased his intense and hard-hitting style during his brief appearances in CHIKARA in 2011. Though his tenure was short, his matches highlighted his evolving persona and physicality, contributing to the depth of CHIKARA’s singles division.

Tommy Dreamer
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling.
Signature moves: Dreamer Driver (Death Valley Driver), DDT, Spicoli Driver.
Brief description: The ECW icon brought his legendary hardcore style to CHIKARA during the 2016 King of Trios tournament. Competing alongside fellow veterans, Dreamer’s gritty performances provided a nostalgic edge to the event.

Tommy End (Malakai Black)
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and submission-based.
Signature moves: Black Mass (Spinning Heel Kick), Owari Death Clutch (Submission), Moonsault Press.
Brief description: Tommy End impressed CHIKARA fans with his precise striking, eerie persona, and innovative offense. Participating in tournaments and special events, he left a lasting impression during his time in the promotion.

Tony Deppen
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Running Knee Strike, Bridging German Suplex, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Tony Deppen brought his fast-paced, hard-hitting style to CHIKARA in its later years. Known for his technical versatility, Deppen was a rising star in CHIKARA’s roster, competing in multi-man and tag team matches.

Tony Nese
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, German Suplex, Running Knee in the Corner.
Brief description: Tony Nese showcased his athleticism and versatility during his appearances in CHIKARA. His performances highlighted his potential as a strong competitor in both singles and multi-man matches.

Too Cold Scorpio
Time in CHIKARA: 2015 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Tumbleweed Leg Drop, Moonsault Leg Drop.
Brief description: Wrestling legend Too Cold Scorpio competed in CHIKARA’s 2015 King of Trios tournament, bringing his iconic moves and timeless charisma to the event. His high-energy performances delighted fans, adding to the tournament’s appeal.

Toshie Uematsu
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Joshi puroresu with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Uranage, Diving Headbutt, Rolling Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Representing Japanese joshi wrestling, Toshie Uematsu competed in the 2012 King of Trios tournament as part of Team JWP. Her experience and unique offense showcased the best of women’s wrestling to the CHIKARA audience.

Toxic Trio (Frightmare, Kobald & Kodama)
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2015 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Brawling with character-driven antics.
Signature moves: Triple Team Splash, Kodama’s Guillotine Leg Drop, Frightmare’s Kneecolepsy.
Brief description: The Toxic Trio was a villainous group composed of CHIKARA regulars Frightmare, Kobald, and Kodama. Their chaotic and dark personas made them an effective heel faction, frequently competing in trios matches and factional rivalries.

Tracy Williams
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Crossface, Piledriver, Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: Tracy Williams brought his technical precision and no-nonsense attitude to CHIKARA during his appearances. Known for his submission expertise, Williams was a formidable opponent in singles and factional contests.

Travis Huckabee
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Huckster Stretch (modified Cloverleaf), Rolling Elbow, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Travis Huckabee, a standout CHIKARA graduate, evolved from a referee into a skilled competitor. His disciplined and straightforward style made him an integral part of teams like The Rumblebees and The Crucible.

Trent Seven
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking with power-based elements.
Signature moves: Seven Star Lariat, Piledriver, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Representing British wrestling, Trent Seven competed in King of Trios tournaments, showcasing his hard-hitting offense and charisma. His performances highlighted the strength of the UK wrestling scene.

Trevor Lee (Cameron Grimes)
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and power elements.
Signature moves: Small Package Driver, Moonsault, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Trevor Lee’s agility and technical prowess made him a notable addition to CHIKARA’s 2016 roster. His matches displayed his in-ring intelligence and dynamic style, even in limited appearances.

Trey Miguel
Time in CHIKARA: 2018 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Meteora (Double Knee Strike), Standing Moonsault, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Trey Miguel, known for his incredible athleticism, showcased his skills in CHIKARA’s multi-man matches. His aerial maneuvers and quick-paced offense earned him attention as a rising star.

Trik Davis
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2008 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Shining Wizard, Bridging German Suplex, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Trik Davis competed in CHIKARA’s early years, often participating in tag team tournaments like the Tag World Grand Prix. His technical finesse and adaptability made him a dependable mid-card performer.

Triple Dragon (Ultimo Dragon, Dragon Kid & Super Dragon)
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Ultimo’s Asai DDT, Dragon Kid’s Dragonrana, Super Dragon’s Psycho Driver.
Brief description: This dream team of legendary and innovative wrestlers competed in the 2007 King of Trios tournament. Their combination of experience, aerial offense, and innovation made them one of the most iconic teams in CHIKARA’s history.

Troll
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2018 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Brawling and power-based with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Clubbing Forearm, Big Splash, Corner Crush.
Brief description: Troll was a diminutive yet feisty member of The Proteus Wheel, serving as comic relief while also playing the role of a sneaky underdog. His matches often leaned into humor, but he was also used as a pawn in The Proteus Wheel's schemes.

Troy Nelson
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy with technical elements.
Signature moves: Whiskey Whip (Irish Whip into Corner), Elbow Drop, Bulldog.
Brief description: Troy Nelson’s lighthearted, bartender-themed gimmick brought a fun and unique character to CHIKARA’s roster. His comedic antics and solid in-ring work made him a fan favorite during his limited appearances.

Tsubasa Kuragaki
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2012 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Argentine Backbreaker, Lariat, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Tsubasa Kuragaki represented Japanese joshi wrestling in the 2011 and 2012 King of Trios tournaments. Her powerful offense and imposing presence made her a standout competitor in both events.

Tsukasa Fujimoto
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Venus Shoot (Running Kick), Bridging German Suplex, Double Stomp.
Brief description: Representing Ice Ribbon, Tsukasa Fujimoto competed in the 2012 King of Trios tournament as part of Team JWP. Her agility and technical prowess made her a highlight in the competition, showcasing the excellence of joshi puroresu.

Tucor
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Tucor Crusher (Spinebuster), Big Boot, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Tucor was a towering member of The Proteus Wheel, embodying raw power and menace. His role in trios and faction matches established him as one of the most dangerous members of the group, often serving as a dominant enforcer.

Turbo
Time in CHIKARA: 2010 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Turbo Tornado (Corkscrew Splash), Springboard Armdrag, Moonsault.
Brief description: Turbo was a masked high-flyer who competed in CHIKARA’s multi-man and singles matches. His speed and agility were his defining traits, making him an exciting addition to the roster during his brief tenure.

Tursas
Time in CHIKARA: 2010-2012 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, faction member.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking elements.
Signature moves: Tursas Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Diving Splash, Big Boot.
Brief description: Tursas was the monstrous enforcer of The BDK (Bruderschaft des Kreuzes). With his immense size and strength, he was a dominant force in factional rivalries and trios matches, often serving as the unstoppable powerhouse of his team.

Twiggy
Time in CHIKARA: 2008-2009 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Springboard Armdrag, Dropkick, Small Package.
Brief description: Twiggy was a plucky underdog who competed in multi-man matches and tournaments. Known for his small stature but big heart, Twiggy brought energy and humor to CHIKARA’s early roster.

Tyler Bate
Time in CHIKARA: 2016-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with power elements.
Signature moves: Tyler Driver ’97 (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Airplane Spin, Dropkick.
Brief description: Representing British wrestling as part of Team Fight Club: PRO, Tyler Bate showcased his versatility and strength in CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments. His performances emphasized his growing reputation as a top-tier wrestler.

Ultimate Spider Jr.
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2012 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Spider Clutch (submission), Hurricanrana, Springboard Splash.
Brief description: Ultimate Spider Jr., a masked luchador representing Osaka Pro, competed in the 2011 and 2012 King of Trios tournaments. His agility and aerial skills made him a standout in the trios division.

Ultimo Breakfast
Time in CHIKARA: 2008-2010 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedy and technical.
Signature moves: Breakfast Buster (Modified Suplex), Toast Cutter (Ace Crusher), Scoop Slam.
Brief description: Ultimo Breakfast was a comedic character whose gimmick revolved around breakfast-themed antics. Despite his humorous nature, he displayed surprising in-ring skill, often participating in multi-man matches and undercard feuds.

UltraMantis Black
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, singles, and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and character-driven antics.
Signature moves: Praying Mantis Bomb (Double Underhook Driver), Cosmic Doom, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: UltraMantis Black was one of CHIKARA’s most iconic and enduring characters. Known for his dark, cult-leader persona and sharp wit, he led factions like The Order of the Neo Solar Temple and The Spectral Envoy. His compelling storylines and unique presence made him a cornerstone of the promotion.

UltraZERO (UltraMantis Black & Mister ZERO)
Time in CHIKARA: 2003-2004 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Assisted Neckbreaker, Tag Team Roll-Up.
Brief description: UltraZERO was a short-lived but memorable tag team pairing of UltraMantis Black and Mister ZERO. Their mix of humor and technical prowess added charm to CHIKARA’s tag team division during the promotion’s early years.

Unibouzu
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2007 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower card, comedic competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Splash, Headbutt, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Unibouzu, a masked comedy character, competed in CHIKARA’s early tag and multi-man matches. His humorous antics and exaggerated persona fit well with CHIKARA’s whimsical atmosphere.

United Nations (Juan Francisco de Coronado, The Proletariat Boar of Moldova & Prakash Sabar)
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2019 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical and character-driven.
Signature moves: Foreign Relations (double team Suplex), Bridging German Suplex, Corner Strikes.
Brief description: The United Nations, led by the smug Juan Francisco de Coronado, was a faction representing exaggerated national stereotypes. Their mix of humor, storytelling, and solid wrestling made them a staple of CHIKARA’s trios division.

UnStable (Vin Gerard, STIGMA & Colin Delaney)
Time in CHIKARA: 2008-2010 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Stigmata (Cobra Clutch Slam), Gerard’s STF, Delaney’s Cutter.
Brief description: UnStable was a faction of disgruntled outcasts led by Vin Gerard. Their matches often featured underhanded tactics, and they played the role of antagonists in various CHIKARA storylines, particularly targeting fan-favorite heroes.

Up In Smoke (Cheech & Cloudy)
Time in CHIKARA: 2006-2010 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Partly Cloudy with a Chance of Cheech (double team Splash), Moonsault, Springboard Armdrag.
Brief description: Cheech & Cloudy were a well-loved tag team known for their innovative offense and humor. They frequently participated in tag tournaments like the Tag World Grand Prix and were a key part of CHIKARA’s tag division during their run.

Ursa Minor in the Night Sky
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2018 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Comedy lower card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Bear Hug, Splash, Corner Strikes.
Brief description: Ursa Minor in the Night Sky was a bear-themed wrestler whose whimsical gimmick fit CHIKARA’s quirky atmosphere. Often appearing in comedic segments and multi-man matches, he was a lighthearted addition to the roster.

Victoria
Time in CHIKARA: 2016 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Widow’s Peak (Gory Neckbreaker), Standing Moonsault, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Victoria, known for her time in WWE, competed in the 2016 King of Trios tournament as part of Team Original Divas Revolution. Her veteran skills and iconic moves added star power and nostalgia to the event.

Vik Dalishus
Time in CHIKARA: 2008 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Lower card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Suplex Variations, Running Elbow.
Brief description: Vik Dalishus appeared in CHIKARA during the 2008 season, participating in multi-man and tag team matches. His no-nonsense style contributed to the promotion’s diverse roster during this period.

Vin Gerard
Time in CHIKARA: 2008-2010 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and faction competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: STF, Bridging German Suplex, Spear.
Brief description: Vin Gerard, formerly Equinox, turned heel after unmasking and embraced a darker, bitter persona. Leading the faction UnStable, Gerard feuded with CHIKARA’s heroes and delivered compelling character-driven matches during his tenure.

Vito Thomaselli
Time in CHIKARA: 2006 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Powerbomb, Corner Lariat.
Brief description: Vito Thomaselli, part of The Iron Saints with Sal and Brandon Thomaselli, competed in CHIKARA’s 2006 Tag World Grand Prix. Their physical, cohesive style made them a formidable team during the tournament.

Volgar
Time in CHIKARA: 2014-2015 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Chokeslam, Corner Splash.
Brief description: Volgar was a menacing enforcer for The Flood, CHIKARA’s top heel faction during its storyline hiatus and revival. His imposing size and brute strength made him a vital part of the faction’s dominance.

Vries Kastelein
Time in CHIKARA: 2018-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Lariat, Spinebuster, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Vries Kastelein, a member of The Crucible, was known for his loyalty to the group’s harsh training regimen. His matches reflected his discipline and aggression, often bolstered by The Crucible’s storytelling dynamics.

Vökoder
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2010 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Vökoder Driver (modified Piledriver), Running Clothesline, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Vökoder was a masked competitor tied to the Order of the Neo Solar Temple, bringing an air of mystery and intrigue to his matches. His character was part of UltraMantis Black’s complex storylines involving manipulation and betrayal.

Wani
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2017 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking with technical and power-based elements.
Signature moves: Dragon Suplex, Spinning Heel Kick, Bridging German Suplex.
Brief description: Wani was a mysterious and disciplined wrestler who brought a calculated, hard-hitting style to CHIKARA. His appearances often tied into factional conflicts, particularly involving The Crown and Court.

Warlord
Time in CHIKARA: 2012 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Full Nelson Slam, Powerbomb, Big Boot.
Brief description: Warlord, known for his iconic run in WWE, participated in CHIKARA’s 2012 King of Trios tournament as part of Team WWF. His larger-than-life presence and power offense added a nostalgic flair to the event.

Warriors Three (Oleg the Usurper, Princess KimberLee & Jaka)
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2016 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical and comedic elements.
Signature moves: Triple Team Suplex, Oleg’s Off With His Head (Running Clothesline), Jaka’s Corner Splash.
Brief description: The Warriors Three were a fan-favorite trio that blended Viking-themed comedy with strong teamwork and physical wrestling. They participated in CHIKARA’s trios division and brought a fun dynamic to the roster.

Washington Bullets (Jon & Trey Williams)
Time in CHIKARA: 2015-2016 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Double Dropkick, Assisted Cutter, Spinebuster.
Brief description: The Washington Bullets, a high-energy tag team, brought their dynamic offense and chemistry to CHIKARA’s tag division. Their exciting matches often showcased their creative double-team maneuvers.

Whisper
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and faction competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Silencer (modified STF), Snap Suplex, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: The Whisper, a mysterious and enigmatic competitor, was a central figure in CHIKARA’s later years. His unsettling presence and intricate storylines, including his ties to The Crucible and his feud with Ophidian, made him a standout character.

Willow Nightingale
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Babe Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Moonsault, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Willow Nightingale brought charisma and a powerful in-ring style to CHIKARA’s women’s division. Known for her infectious energy and versatility, she competed in intergender and tag team matches, leaving a strong impression on fans.

Worker Ant
Time in CHIKARA: 2005-2010, 2014-2018 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and comedic elements.
Signature moves: Antzuigiri, Powerbomb, Cloverleaf.
Brief description: Worker Ant was a key member of The Colony, a popular insect-themed faction. The original Worker Ant was an underdog fan favorite, while the second iteration brought more aggression to the group. Both versions were integral to The Colony’s success in CHIKARA’s trios tournaments.

Wrecking Crew (Max Smashmaster, Blaster McMassive & Flex Rumblecrunch)
Time in CHIKARA: 2013-2015 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: Power-based with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Death Blow (Triple Team Powerbomb), Smashmaster’s Running Senton, Flex’s Big Boot.
Brief description: The Wrecking Crew was a dominant heel faction known for their brute strength and overpowering tactics. They played a major role in CHIKARA’s factional storylines and were fierce competitors in the King of Trios tournaments.

X-Pac
Time in CHIKARA: 2011-2012 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: X-Factor (Facebuster), Bronco Buster, Spinning Heel Kick.
Brief description: Wrestling legend X-Pac participated in CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments, bringing nostalgia and star power to the events. His performances highlighted his enduring athleticism and ability to connect with fans.

Xyberhawx 2000 (Razorhawk, Nytehawk, Razerhawk, & Sylverhawk)
Time in CHIKARA: 2017-2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying with lucha libre-inspired elements.
Signature moves: Assisted Springboard Moonsault, Razor’s Edge (Diving Splash), Double Team Suplexes.
Brief description: Xyberhawx 2000 were a futuristic, cyber-themed faction that blended humor with incredible athleticism. Their matches were fast-paced and exciting, making them a favorite in CHIKARA’s trios division and adding a unique flavor to the roster.

Yoshiaki Yago
Time in CHIKARA: 2007 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong-style with striking and power-based elements.
Signature moves: Lariat, Brainbuster, Running Powerslam.
Brief description: Representing Japanese wrestling, Yoshiaki Yago competed in the 2007 King of Trios tournament. Known for his hard-hitting style, he added an element of intensity and global diversity to the event.

Yoshihito Sasaki
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong-style with grappling and striking elements.
Signature moves: Olympic Slam, German Suplex, Lariat.
Brief description: Sasaki represented Big Japan Wrestling in the 2011 King of Trios tournament. His physical style and commanding presence made him a standout competitor and a strong addition to the event.

Young Bucks (Matt Jackson & Nick Jackson)
Time in CHIKARA: 2009-2013 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Main event, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: More Bang for Your Buck (Rolling Fireman’s Carry into 450 Splash and Moonsault), Superkick Party, Meltzer Driver.
Brief description: The Young Bucks brought their innovative and fast-paced tag team wrestling to CHIKARA, participating in tournaments such as King of Trios and facing off against top teams in the promotion. Their matches were always crowd-pleasers, cementing their reputation as one of the best tag teams in the world.

Yuji Okabayashi
Time in CHIKARA: 2011 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Main event, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and grappling elements.
Signature moves: Golem Splash (Diving Splash), Lariat, German Suplex.
Brief description: Representing Big Japan Wrestling, Yuji Okabayashi competed in the 2011 King of Trios tournament. His imposing size and explosive power made him a dominant force and a standout in the tournament.

Yuka Sakazaki
Time in CHIKARA: 2019 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic and technical elements.
Signature moves: Magical Girl Splash (450 Splash), Magical Merry-Go-Round (Spinning Elbow), Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Yuka Sakazaki, the "Magical Girl," brought her unique energy and charisma to CHIKARA’s 2019 King of Trios tournament. Her dynamic offense and engaging personality made her a fan favorite during her limited appearances.

Zachary Wentz
Time in CHIKARA: 2018 (sporadic appearance).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles, and trios competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Cardiac Kick (Running Knee Strike), Standing Moonsault, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Zachary Wentz competed in CHIKARA during the later years of the promotion, bringing his high-energy and innovative offense to multi-man matches. His performances highlighted his potential as a rising star.

Zack Sabre Jr.
Time in CHIKARA: 2011, 2013 (guest appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, trios competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: European Clutch (Pinning Combination), Cross Armbreaker, Penalty Kick.
Brief description: Zack Sabre Jr., a master of technical wrestling, represented British wrestling in CHIKARA’s King of Trios tournaments. His intricate submission holds and seamless transitions showcased the artistry of European-style wrestling.

ZERO
Time in CHIKARA: 2002-2003 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and comedic elements.
Signature moves: ZERO Hour (STO), Suplex Variations, Running Elbow.
Brief description: ZERO was one of CHIKARA’s early roster members, known for his technical skill and straightforward style. Though his time in the promotion was brief, he contributed to CHIKARA’s foundation as a technical wrestling haven.

Zero Gravity (Brett Gakiya & CJ Esparza)
Time in CHIKARA: 2012-2014 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Double Moonsault, Assisted Tornado DDT, Springboard Armdrag.
Brief description: Zero Gravity brought their fast-paced, high-flying tag team style to CHIKARA. Their matches often electrified crowds and showcased the promotion’s commitment to innovative tag team wrestling.
